The book’s format, with a chapter for each principle, allows you to pick up the book and focus on the topic of greatest need or interest at this moment in time. Taking the time to master your business is essential, and this book can help you do just that. You can learn more about the Victory Circles program and philosophy at www.victorycircles.com.
This is actually pretty simple. The first thing you need to do is make sure that you have at least one Google Voice account and one SIP account configured – the SIP account will be an extension off your Asterisk server. Unlike the old method, here you start by configuring both Google Voice and your Asterisk extension in the usual manner. If you need any help with that, see this article:
QSHXS Blog (qshxsblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
I've also had time to work on some creative organizing for our upcoming school year (I am hoping since I am taking the time to make this year's system pretty, that alone will encourage me to stick with it longer than my record of two weeks). I am very organized on paper but in reality, well...we just won't go there. I'm on a euphoric high right now of being prepared for next year. I choose to remain on my cloud as long as I can.
People helping people, and belonging to each other. It just doesn’t get any better, does it? Powerful stuff to restore faith in humanity going on up in there, folks. And again, it didn’t stop once the truck rolled out of the driveway. In August 2011, with the help of Jennifer Blake, another sweet Bama Belle living in LA, we were able to hold a benefit and raise some money. With these funds, trees were purchased from Habitat for Humanity and planted where so many had been ripped from the soil. This made us, and Mother Nature happy
If you have filed for one of these chapters, then the creditors will no longer be able to try and collect a debt from you. Should they contact you, then you can ask them to speak to your lawyer. The lawyer you hired, will serve as your representative with these creditors.
for the protection of the public welfare, health, peace and morals of the people of the Commonwealth and to prohibit forever the open saloon, and all of the provisions of this act shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of this purpose.Are you kidding me? In the trash with it, and we need never soil our minds with it again. An alcohol code should establish taxes -- of a reasonable level, based on pure alcohol content, not whether its wine, beer, or spirits -- a licensing facility for producers, importers, wholesalers, and retailers that benefits the state, not lawyers or speculators; provide rules for operation that are not based on moral or religious grounds, punishments for breaking those rules, and an enforcement procedure for dealing with this in a prompt manner; and puts the Commonwealth out of the booze business completely. Sheesh. How hard can it be?
It took several minutes of questioning all three of them before I could put it together. Terry was trying to tell Matt not to call someone that was on duty to make a professional call. He wanted Matt to find someone off duty and ask them to stop in as a favor. That made sense to me, but apparently what Matt heard was, "Don't call anyone". When Matt disappeared without getting medical help, and when Luke insisted he didn't want stitches, Terry finally just cleaned and bandaged his son himself.
A good example are drummers playing heavy metal, who grew up listening to heavy metal afraid to step out of it. Rockdrummers playing jazz are boring – but jazzdrummers playing rock are superb! I think you can place this allegory onto us (not that anyone of us has played in a jazz band though hehe) and because of this slightly different approach where we come from we will have no problem standing out from the crowd.
Our little one is blooming, too. A month ago, she was babbling baby babble. I have every reason to believe she actually is trying her best to tell us stuff, though I have no idea what she’s talking about. (more mysteries!)
I think I did really well in both of the interviews. In fact, during the interview with the Chrysalis, all I could keep thinking was - why wouldn't you hire me? I have years of experience in hotels and reception. So, I wasn't too surprised when they called and offered me the position. I was saddened, however, when I heard that BCS chose a different person who had more experience. Saddened, but based on my thoughts while at the Chrysalis, not surprised. The only hard thing is that this feels more like a lateral move where-as the BCS job would have been a vertical move. However, that said, I have wanted to work at the Chrysalis for a long time.
‘I’m so pleased that we moved.’
New beads are up, this is Island Girl. Guess I was in the mood for some tropical dreams yesterday, lol.
But they were ideal fodder for the saucy part of our 'traditional' Halloween dessert of 'Mud, blood & poached brains'.
But that was only if I was having company. If I was alone, meals went straight from cardboard box to belly.
In contrast, de Lint's writing is elegant, but in a way that flows smoothly, serving the story rather than distracting from it. His use of language is superb right from the opening page, when our protagonist Tarn flashes back to when an old wizard announced that he wanted Tarn, then a street urchin, as his apprentice:
“The money Kentucky receives each year from the MSA provides funding for many invaluable programs –from agriculture to education,” General Conway said. “My office continues to closely monitor and enforce the agreement and stands ready to defend actions brought to challenge it in both state and federal courts.”
We also took in a day at Sea World! Jessie flew out of Orlando back home. JB, me, and the kiddos continued on to South Florida for the rest of our vacation.
As craft brewers embrace beers with less than 5% alcohol by volume and can packaging long held to ridicule after being stacked in "beeramids" and smashed against one too many frat boy foreheads, they're battling both for market share in an increasingly crowded segment and against longstanding beer stigmas passed down through generations of drinkers. True. But craft session beer also addresses a problem, as ratebeer's Joe Tucker (a strong ally of session beer) points out:
Previous Weight: 184
Wha- ? You... I don't even... RRRRRRARRGHHHHH!!!!!!!!!!!
64. Go Tell it on the Mountain: James Baldwin
I have been waiting for this moment for a long time (I was tempted to say all my life, but the wait hasn't quite that long)!!!
Having been in Texas not quite three months, I had yet to build up a social network of people who would not be too grossed out by my ghastly, ghostly pallor and sudden abandonment of basic hygiene to take me to the doctor’s office for a third time in two days.* Back in Kentucky, I was ridiculously lucky to have a roommate who would do so without my asking– in addition to decorating my extremely girly Christmas tree and even hopping across the apartment while on crutches to bring me chicken soup when I was once again bed-ridden. He, without a doubt, wins the “Best Roommate Ever” award.
'This is the ultimate Scottish reference book' - Waterstones Christmas catalogue, 2008
Absolutely primo modern speculative fiction. After a few different books that I sort of enjoyed and sort of just felt meh about, this one knocked my socks off. Concepts, delicious. Story, engaging. Philosophical meandering, minimal. Characters, fleshy and companionable.
"No way! I know what I'm doing now! Let me do another one! I understand how to do it. I'll do better! I promise!"
Ministers have promised that frontline warranted police officer roles will not be undertaken by private companies for profit. The picture above shows that this is clearly untrue. You could be convicted and sent to prison on the strength of the evidence gathered by a for-profit corporate investigator.
Mentions of barrel aged beers, American hops, massive IBUs and the effect our silly UK taxation system has on stronger, fuller flavoured beers was very welcome. Mention of Fullers, who's John Keeling recently visited to brew our soon to be infamous collaboration, warmed my heart.
7) Gentle kneading massage on the spot of trouble after the exercise.
Meghan, angry that Ben cheated on Felicity, decides to put a black-magic-spell on him. She stirs up her magic potion and adds a strand of Felicity’s hair.
Of Stoves, we know that all hot things burn
Verse 6, “But in everything by prayer and supplication with thanksgiving, let your requests be made known unto God and the peace of God which passes all understanding shall keep your hearts and minds through Christ Jesus.”
Texas Governor Rick Perry, the front runner stumbled badly in last week's debate and if he has another couple of bad outings, he could very well fade away. Not only were a number of his answers weak, but he failed to take the battle to the other candidates, leaving people wondering how he'd actually do against President Obama.
Hello abode lovers and happy Monday! I hope all of you had a great weekend, I definitely did. It was full of loving on my nephews, hanging out with Mister Husband and attempting to decorate the abode for Christmas. Yes, I said attempting. Why? Because my stupid, fake Christmas tree that is pre-lit didn't friggin' work. I took that big ole thing out of the box, scratched up my arms like I was fighting with a pissed off kitten and plugged it in only to find that my tree is tired of Christmas. What the heck!?! My tree officially stole the Christmas right out of my abode. So, what did I do? I started placing all of my Christmas doo-dads all over the house and may just have to be okay with that. Sad, right? No tree? I just can't go out and get a new fake tree, they're way too expensive, and honestly- I think it's a bit too late for me to scrounge around and pick out a real one! We're trying to stay as budget friendly as possible this Christmas and a new tree just isn't in the budget! Am I terrible? please say no....
Samaras's speech, liberally peppered with ultra-nationalist demands was carefully honed to appeal to the local audience and while it was warmly received it was little more than a rehash of past, highly improbable promises and emotional calls to voters to give him an overall majority.
This week's Sunday Stills photo challenge was pretty fun. We were to take two photos, one of something large, and the second photo would be a small part of the first photo.
6. Are you a bachelor?
Ancestors will be called on to haunt the alleged murderer of Johannes Mtshumane Mogale, executive director of policing Ndumiso Jaca said at the memorial service in Pretoria on Thursday.
Do not stand at my grave and weep, I am not there. I do not sleep.
Ranger: Jet Black Archival Ink; Forest Moss, Brushed Corduroy Distress Inks; clear embossing powder; Perfect Pearls Mist - Heirloom Gold; Silver Paint Dabber; Fired Brick, Aged Mahogany Distress Stains; Glossy Accents
Hope you have had a good day,
No, not the pesky, 'I have something in my eye' type of dust. I'm talking about the Eye Dust you'll want to have! (Ok, please humour me and let me pretend I'm funny. . . it's been a while). Marcelle has ten fantastic colours in their multi-use pigment range, sadly I can only show you 8. . . the last two (my favourite) are MIA. I haven't seen them since the last time I went home. . . I'm thinking that one of my sisters might have scammed them from my makeup bag. (If you did, I want them back. Thanks.)
I hope you have a lovely Wednesday!
The Mickschl Family is adopting 16 year old Jonathan. THIS IS PURE AND SIMPLE - A RESCUE... This boy would be ON THE STREETS in a matter of months if this family wasn't going to get him. They are snatching him out of the fire and WE NEED TO HELP THEM!! They adopted TWO OTHER CHILDREN... in two separate adoptions... THIS MAKES THREE ADOPTIONS in less than 2 years!!
What a fab weekend. David Almond was the speaker and he gave some fascinating insights into his progress as a writer and about how he writes. (Very organic and brainstormy, throw all your story arcs away!) (Not sure if I can quite do that but...)
You all know Facebook, right? Fun little place, where we can all interact and have fun together in a way we can't really do here? I have 1152 "fans" on my blog's Facebook page, and I'm not absolutely certain how many of those people actually read this blog or even know it exists.
So it was perfect.
I often wonder what faith in Buddhism means to a purported 70% of Sri Lanka. The temples, the flowers, the verses of pali few undersand, and the saffron-robed monks that preside over it all.
(I'll try not to hyperventilate - but ohmygod this might just be the death of me! I'm so terribly excited!)
Could it be that Plaid is an old persons party, or does it apply to all political parties, might we be seeing the demise of street level politics ?
It was delicious. If only I'd thought to make some chocolate sauce we could have had Bounty sundaes.
Wedding or engagement tradition dictated the bride’s parents give the groom a watch and the groom’s parents gift the bride a pearl necklace. Today the gift doesn’t have to be a watch or necklace, or you can skip this tradition altogether.
It seems a pretty lousy tactic to use other people's religious beliefs as an excuse to promote your own prejudices, given that the students attend the university of their own free will and are not forced to drink. " My compliments to the Muslim students of LMU who are fighting back against this nonsense.
And I seem to manage a higher percentage rate at keeping them alive.
Mix group one together in a medium bowl.
The Couscous analogy tells us the following: it is a fallacy to consider average as representatives when it comes to incomes and households in Morocco. There are great disparities and these have been dangerously widening; we are catching up pretty fast with one of the most unequal societies on earth: the United States.
Dummer then played drums, toured and recorded with Lowell Fulson and Eddie C. Campbell. (Lowell Fulson - "Think Twice Before You Speak." Eddie C. Campbell - "The Baddest Cat On The Block." Both JSP Records 1082 & 1087 repectively.) His next group, True Life Confessions, featured his wife Helen April, second drummer Manic Esso from The Lurkers, bassist Harry Kakouli from Squeeze, guitarists Robin Bibi and Mark Nevin(later to form Fairground Attraction and write the hit "Perfect") and two Afro-French girl singers, Any Toco-Salvetti and her sister Myriam. They issued several records on A&M, but none charted.
Sleigh Bells will make their network television debut on SNL. The Brooklyn duo quickly earned the adoration of critics with their debut album in 2010, “Treats,” ending up on over 150 “Best-Of” lists for that year. Their newest album, “Reign of Terror,” will be released on February 21.
18. What do you wish you’d done more of?
*Scott shared that the other day, he and Isaac were in the car and had to pull over for an ambulance. Isaac said, "I wonder if that's somebody who got bit by a shark" (we live in the midwest.... I'm just guessing but.... probably not).
1. Replace Sinks & Faucets
From mornin' till night how those bastards did fight,
You of curls and face so fair
One sign of a slowing economy Nothaft mentioned was real Gross Domestic Product, in which he explained rose at an annualized rate of 2.2 percent in the first quarter of this year, a drop from the previous quarter of 3 percent and below the market consensus forecast of 2.5 percent.
The Ethan Banning Files are series of short stories starring Naomi Clark’s rough-around-the-edges P.I. These three stories are a great introduction to one of Clark’s most addictive characters- they’re like an Ethan Banning gateway drug. Once you get a glimpse of the train wreck that is his life, it’s hard to look away.
The Austrian kitchen has a good reputation among food connoisseur’s. The now tiny central European country has had a very dramatic history, and at one time it was a European superpower with 50 million inhabitants, which was made up of hundreds of different ethnic groups. All of these participated in building a food culture, by mixing flavours, ingredients and ideas from very different people. Austrian cuisine has fusioned cooking styles from Germany, France, Italy, Czech, Slovak, Poland and the Balkans. This has made the Austrian dishes rich on flavour, colour and charm.
2. What do you do?
This situation is made problematic because I am not a resident of Calgary. If I was, I would go into the clinic and they could give me same day results. However they make no effort in making it easier for out of town patients. The clinic here said they faxed the result to them three times. The fertility clinic said they did not receive any of them. Instead of the fertility clinic just calling and asking (they would have the power to get the results over the phone) they said it was my problem and until I got it to them I would have to stay on all my medications. As a result I sat trying to figure out why they weren’t getting them. It took a lot of back and forth phone calls and again waiting for someone at the clinic to call me back.
Finding a great deal is thrilling. You may almost have the adrenaline pumping whenever you discover that you have saved a lot of money, or actually just seventy five cents. This never will get old. Not each day goes by that you could toss aside an run out coupon in order to find a brand new deal elsewhere should you didn’t have the opportunity to make your own purchase at first.
And besides, I have hardly any accent at all.
K: “You need to send that to me in a text message so that I can read it to Sal and she can see how crazy you are before I ask her to drive me to the Gap* so I can jump.”
And it made me think: is our world that bad? Or is it simply the fact that “bad news” sells?
This is also for CAS-usal Fridays Easter basket challenge. I always put flowers in my mom's basket - she likes chocolate, but nothing cheers her more than flowers (and a hand-stamped card!)!
Have one of Sassy's friends come over for the evening to help her Dad out
There are a lot more than
With no trace of dirt and painfully white walls
Mexican Chocolate Brownies
The Seeds of Death is a base-under-siege story. Yes, the Troughton era was a bit overcrowded with those kind of stories, but this one is different. For one thing, we get the relief of more than one location. We see the concern of the Earth command centre when the moonbase is no longer in contact with earth. The Doctor does not conveniently turn up in the base-under-siege in the TARDIS (oh hello, problem with alien invaders is it?) but has to travel there in an antiquated rocket.
And guess what.
Most people got married in June, because they took their annual bath in May and they still smelled pretty good in June. However, since they were starting to smell a bit, brides carried a bouquet of flowers to hide the smell of body odour.
The rest of the week, I am going to highlight what I did to pull together my little dude's party. I am so excited to share and hope to see you back here tomorrow for Pinata Making 101 - Mario Style.
09. Tell The Truth
Flying like a supersonic jet above the skyscrapers.
“I really don’t have a lot in common with the people who attend the Comic Con. It’s like assuming that all people who write prose are the same.” Harvey Pekar
No overt sexual activity - be nude not lewd – this just undermines our objectives
Depends on which day are you asking? I am late sleeper every day and an early riser only on weekdays… I am the first one to wake up on weekdays and last one on weekends…not even my son can beat me...
OK... I'm done talking about it now
I tell her to call when she gets to work
Anyway, I just matted it onto a brown Coredinations cs and embossed a white cs using Cuttlebug Floral Screen folder. Finished it off with 2 chocolate pearls on top left and bottom right side. After finishing the card, I thought it's a bit bare on the stamped panel (just above the right side) so I decided to look for a stamp that will somehow fill that space. And then I saw this Grace Through Faith stamp by Clear Dollar Stamps which I haven't used since purchased. Since it's a clear stamp, I easily managed to stamp it to where I want it to be using Choc Chip ink by SU!.
If you were stranded on a desert island, what three ‘personal’ things could you not live without?
2) share 8 things about myself
The fact that the soundtrack carries one of my favourite Chopin pieces (Nocturne E-flat Opus 9 #2) was another delightful surprise. My collection of the soundtrack pieces in Youtube: http://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=PL7BAC4DA44B3C09D5
For me, I have only just begun my venture into vintage, but I still loved everything at the fair. Each stall was elegantly cluttered with knick-knacks and accessories, accompanied by rails and rails of timeless clothing. Silky scarves burst from chests and hampers, and jewellery glistened from across the room.
Finally, although not the focus of this article, it’s import to note that the Department of Treasury’s Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC) enforces trade embargoes and economic sanctions against specific countries (Cuba, Iran, North Korea – you get the picture) and individuals and entities (terrorists, narcotics traffickers and other bad guys). OFAC publishes the names of these ne’er-do-wells in the “Specially Designated Nationals” or “SDN” list. (BIS also maintains several lists of prohibited persons). Together, the Commerce and State export controls and OFAC sanctions programs are designed to protect U.S. foreign policy interests and to prevent U.S. persons from doing business with the wrong types of customers.
These days “we” want everything to happen quickly, not now but right now!! We would like for everything to operate in a similar manner to our microwaves, from cold to cooked in a manner of minutes. It reminds me of a skit from In Living Color. You remember the one, they were set up in a little hole in the wall diner, and the waitress would take the customer’s order and Tommy Davidson would prepare the order fast as all get out. The thing is, HE NEVER GOT THE ORDER RIGHT….EVER! Someone would say, “my name is rose” and he would make JELLO, ”what’s your best dish” he would make fresh fish! As leaders on our campus and in our communities, it is imperative that we escape and combat this Tommy Davidson Effect or TDE frame of mind. When we hear what we want to here, not because we are not listening, but because we are too busy. Sometimes we are stretched thin working with 7 organizations and other times we are too busy being a leader to take the time to listen to someone not on the exec board. The TDE takes many forms but the results are always the same, lousy!
This study, in subjecting the TRC's report to careful scrutiny, has chartered new ground. Thus far, the commission's report has mostly been uncritically acclaimed. It has been hailed as having set a precedent for other countries. A more sober evaluation is needed.
As the space program is being ramped up to a scale never before seen in history (it's my belief that Obama could very well have been installed to transform America from an arms-based economy to a space-based one), I think everyone should at least familiarize themselves with Hoagland's work, which long predates us all in Synchromysticland. Given the subsequent escalation of the wars, the surveillance state and the ongoing destruction of the middle class (the continuation of the Bush agenda, in other words) that seemed like a prediction for the round-file, where all of the predictions made by professional psychics, media pundits and corporate scientists belong. But I'd forgotten my long-held maxim about change-- that real change is slow, laborious and often invisible.
ATTORNEY: Was this a male or a female?
Cool, then strain through a fine sieve or a muslin cloth, discarding any ginger solids. This syrup will keep for about two - four days in the refrigerator, and can also be frozen.
Breakfast Before:
The Huguenot cross is a symbol of steadfast conviction — a faith so strong that it did not even fear the stake. Descendants of the Huguenots are not allowed to forget their origins, nor to consider their religious precepts merely superficial.
Prabhupada: These sahajiyas will come out of so many devotees. What can be done? From my Guru Maharaja’s disciples, so many sahajiyas came. These are called sahajiyas. Very easily they capture thing. So my Guru Maharaja used to say, “When my disciples will be sahajiya, it will be more dangerous.” He used to say like that. Take things very easily. You know that Purushottama, supposed to be my Godbrother?”
While a shady garden isn’t going to produce as many vegetables as one in full sun, there’s no harm in making a virtue of necessity: A shady garden may just let you have the best of two worlds—a garden that produces a steady supply of fresh vegetables and the aesthetic enjoyment of a yard filled with towering beautiful trees.
We believe that the stock market is an independent structure, operating within government guidelines… But when we open up government’s Institutional Fund and Pension Fund investment portfolios and asset listings, we can easily find that the stock market is owned through stock investment by government funds.
We resolved that we, the People, would never forget. Then we forgot.
CPT and Eme were watching Harry Potter when we finally got home. We watched for a few minutes, then sent Eme and Joe and Jim to bed. CPT and I chatted about our days, and about plans for the next few months. Then, at 9:30pm, I got the call from Tom that they needed picked up at the church. So off I went.
So, out of curiosity, I wanted to pose this question:
Ooh and would you like a mother in law update? Well we had a bit of a "heated discussion" two nights ago about parenting. I'm quite proud of myself for standing my ground as a few years back I would probably have held back but I did say what I felt and pointed out that she was being a total hypocrite! .... she is now back to almost best behaviour, I guess the thought of not being fed or being allowed to use the shower is not worth the satisfaction of having a go at your daughter in law ;)
Tomorrow will be a longer post with more details on why I failed and what I can do to improve my writing pace, because there’s definitely room for improvement, but I feel that it’s going to end up costing me money.
“Lonely as it may be to be the lone dissenter, I value my conscience more than anything,” said Tunku Aziz, adding that he was prepared to face any disciplinary action from DAP.
I learned a lot from the class--but the most interesting thing I took away from the class came from watching Claudia respond to all of the student writing. It wasn't that she didn't give genuine feedback and suggestions: it's just that she was so genuinely enthusiastic to every piece of writing. She found something to love about *everything.*
I’m glad whenever I can share her laughter
This basically allow CSS and JavaScript to load without going into Sitecore pipeline and you don’t have to disable the compression in the IIS. (You can check Enable static content compression in IIS again).
As of now about 158,600 animals have been infected, according to the agriculture ministry’s animal health division.
OI Collaboration Success Criteria
The past two days of my Golden Week adventure brought me to the two biggest theme parks in Kyushu: Space World, near Kitakyushu, and Mitsui Greenland, near Kumamoto.
b. External Communications
So at the outset, I’m a total humanitarian. You’re all welcome, in advance.
Disclaimer: Boulevard gave me the bottle of Rye on Rye gratis. It did not affect this review, but you can be the judge of that.
John is now over 70 and is still currently creating pictures (one of the latest is titled ‘Roller’). His pictures certainly cause interest, adding a bright new dimension to any wall. So sophisticated, original and contemporary, always a talking point, they intrigue, surprise, are beautiful and appeal to all age groups.
most of whom had joined
So why doesn’t it exist? It is because our financial system is based on something called fractional reserve banking.
Over medium heat, melt milk chocolate chips, peanut butter, and butterscotch chips in small saucepan.
"Hoochie' sounds really Chinese, doesn't it?
you home.
Location: Cincinnati, OH
First of all, I want to say "Happy Birthday" to my dad! Love you, miss you, and hope you have a wonderful day! Hope the haggis at the Celtic festival was all you dreamed of and more....
But in this sense, the bank robbery becomes a very specific kind of spatial operation, one that cuts through architecture along unprecedented obliques and diagonals. It is counter-space: an illicit misuse of plan and section. In the process, the bank robbery produces and exploits perforations in the built environment; it operates by way of gaps, sudden accelerations and pauses unplanned for by the bank's own protective administrators. In one sense, the bank robbery proceeds by asking a simple question: how do we move through this building as if the building is not really there?
I hope all of you will visit their blogs and leave them so love.
“Social media helps train expats for international assignments because it also allows for so many perspectives and opinions and experiences to be shared on any one subject,” says Silver.
where are you? A whole mouth goes by,
I tried everything to get him to smile for me. I finally told him to say the funniest word he could think of...
He also participated for 5 months in a DARPA internship, holds one patent, and is a graduate of the 2011 Singularity University Graduate Studies Program.
Have you read any books lately that used this effectively? How do you add tension?
The Griffin Pottery Studio specialises in bespoke pottery, decorative ware, and commemorative items for christenings, anniversaries, weddings and birthdays, and aims to provide a unique and personal service. Fancy trying your hand? Take advantage of the range of courses on offer, from courses for absolute beginners to ones for those with more advanced skills.
Lies have consequences, and who can say how many of those women would not have died degrading, painful and terrifying deaths had the police not been seeking the PC, role profile perfect, white serial killer? The victims were mostly older women, with names such as Maybelle, Ethel and Elizabeth, not the teen co-eds of popular serial killer fiction, but they had families and loved ones, and has lived through wars, depressions, booms and first kisses, they did not deserve to die as they did.
He seemed puzzled. “You know the sword, young, sir?”
THRIP (above right)
James J. Siegel of Guywriters has invited me to participate in a fundraiser for the San Francisco non-profit, male-driven writing group happening Monday, March 19 at the Elbo Room.
For More Information Regarding a Permanent Economic Solution that is Best for ALL
Violence and intimidation directed towards non-Muslims living in or around areas dominated by Muslim populations saw a dramatic rise during the Seven Month Calm (as it is now called), from September 23, 2012 to April 23, 2013. At the same time, suspicion, hostility, and violence directed towards Muslims also increased sharply, inducing many of those who lived outside the ghettoes to relocate back in.
As I went over in looking at Creating an Army, al Qaeda has a problem in that it operates as it trains when not in combat. Although having a number of low-level operational capabilities that are on-going, al Qaeda can't really expect to see much of a return on suicide bombers: you can't get a veteran corps of suicide bombers to make them more effective. Because it now practices a high form of bureaucracy much of the time, its terror functions must reflect this as is seen in the minutia that is tracked at the highest levels. If this is how you recruit, train, and then put operatives into place for long term missions, you have the problem of those operatives knowing no other way of doing things. Getting skilled field operatives is essential and al Qaeda started out with a small cadre of that which is now down to Zawahiri, the Egyptian Doctor. It must be noted that Zawahiri does not have skills in economics, he never was much of a 'boots on the ground' terrorist and is more a spiritual head than administrative head of aQ. At this point the winning times in Afghanistan that he was not a part of are only a distant memory for the organization as the rest of the original cadre have been killed out. There is no historical memory of those good times left in al Qaeda.
In the end, JNT decides the only option is to force the Doctor to regenerate into someone who doesn’t mind the flashy neon logo. After a long battle down various corridors and up several floor levels, the drama comes to a head at a pivotal moment on the roof of the Television Centre. JNT strikes the Doctor one final time, and sends him flying towards the edge of the rooftop.
It seems like the most open and flexible minds, the most fertile fields for our planting, are also the best candidates for being convinced that art matters. It seems that there is a reason language acquisition happens most easily at the early stages of one’s life. There is a profound truth to the saying that “You can’t teach an old dog new tricks”. We become inflexible as we grow older. Our opinions and habits become ever more ingrained. We are less easily convinced that things add up differently than the way we now put them together. Unless art already is a part of the picture, what jackhammer can wedge a new opening for it in our adult lives?……
The not so awesome part? Having to move ALL our stuff. Even if it's only up one flight of stairs, it's still really annoying. (Especially moving the furniture!) We're trying to do it little by little so it doesn't get to overwhelming, but hopefully the process won't drag on for too long! Also, since this place is a little bit bigger I'm already going crazy with ideas of things I want to do (and things I want to buy) to decorate it! The hard part is even though it looks like we'll be in Tahoe for awhile, I know that we're not going to be here forever so we don't want to buy a bunch of furniture for this place that might not work when we move. At the same time, I think this new apartment has some great potential so I want to make it look nice. The top priorities at the moment are: getting some patio furniture (preferably a table, chairs, and some chaise lounges would be great!), buying a new grill (we sold ours when we moved to South Carolina because our apartment didn't allow them), getting a new kitchen table (we sold our kitchen table when we left Colorado because we didn't have space for it in the downstairs apartment), and possibly putting up some new curtains. I'm scouring Pinterest for some good DIY ideas and we'll hopefully be doing some shopping over the next few weeks. Once we get everything moved in, I'll definitely be sharing some pictures!
Truth tells us that he and Miz should be main eventing every PPV, and tonight, they will prove that.
Ooo(d), welcome back Chris :) And you are right. This sure, strong, fearless, thriving, pacey, action packed, thought provoking, clever, emotional, challenging, lovely, brilliant but indescribable prog deserves more than a weekly review! Let's cast aside any barely remaining attempts at being ordinary chaps and jabber away. I love Top Gear, and have even watched football. It's just that Doctor Who is a whole lot better than any of that.
So yesterday, after packing the car (as usual to the gunnels) including the newly varnished woodwork for the rear deck, we got in and the engine wouldn’t start! After a panicky phone call to our local tyre and battery man in the village and within the hour we were on our way with a new battery!
Riggs believes that anomalous energy occurrences are not always limited to ghost light areas, and that sometimes they can extend over vast areas, with disturbing effects and consequences.
Garlic, 4 pcs, chopped finely
On Monday we had to go to Raleigh and we just took them along not daring to put anything in there with them. Come on this was not a lunch date.
We timed it just right on a Sunday afternoon so we did not have to pay admission. This museum is really well organized and takes you through the life and various styles of Picasso. My favorite part of the museum was the rooms dedicated to Picasso’s study of Las Meninas. He obsessed over the original picture by Velazquez and reinterpreted the image into his signature style.
Another effect is more eerie, the this-ness and then-ness of specific studio vibes, placed in uncanny adjacence with one another. There's a kind of crooked grooviness about the sound, something zombie: music that appears to be living and breathing, the result of the human touch, but is in fact only a simulacrum of life, "hyped up by Hurby".
Red is the color, and that is why
1) Boil cut potato in salted water until tender, and then drain.
I cannot believe we are less than two weeks away from our wedding day. There have been so many milestones in the last few months - but this is the BIG one.
Whoa, whoa, whoa...I am putting my foot down right now on all types of time-traveling wishes. I refer you to the collected works of "Back to the Future," just so you can get a small inkling of the damage you could do to yourself and others. No one wants to get hit on by their mom, right? I think we're all in agreement on that. But, I am a magnanimous all-powerful Wish-Granting Dude, so I'll remove all your bad memories and replace them with the life experiences of Tutti from "The Facts of Life." Fair enough? Good.
“Meet TruthSeeker, infamous ARS troll who makes it a habit of targeting and harassing exes. A man of no value to anyone.”
The very fact that the Constitution limits the power of government is a good thing and consistent with the intent of those who wrote and established it.
Therefore! 1 week ago I re-color it to dark blue, yup dark blue people, not green. I did not color it black because black is just... just... too dark n gloomy for me ha.ha.ha...
It was then that big brother Max stepped up and cruised through, being so so proud of himself!
This topic has been nagging at me for quite some time. It is a matter about the next phase of social media, and how humans interact with each other. Perhaps, the latter should say “how humans are happiest when interacting with each other.”
Digital Rapids provides innovative solutions, technology and expertise that enable media organizations and professionals to bring live and on-demand video to wider audiences more efficiently, more effectively and more profitably. Our award- winning hardware and software solutions span the critical points in today’s media operations, including ingest, encoding, transcoding, streaming, broadcast and workflow automation. We’re bringing our complete lineup to the NAB Show in booth SL5624. Featured demos will include a new version of our Digital Rapids Transcode Manager software, powered by our groundbreaking Kayak technology platform; and our newest live encoders for blending ‘traditional television’ encoding with revenue-expanding multi-screen distribution.
Just as I would start to feel like I "got" the move and steps, she would change it up again and go to a different genre.
So, of course, I cleaned her up and no one got soup that day. Well, I had one noodle broth soup with oyster crackers. I also had a sister who never took more than her share again.
At 2:30 a.m. I was about to fall off my bed and realized I was being pushed off the edge by two sweet little girls. I woke up Gavin to take them back to their room and headed for the bathroom. With a full force gush, my water broke in the toilet! We called our midwife, Wendy, to let her know, then went back to bed. Was it hard to sleep? Yes, I was very excited, but I also knew what was coming and wanted to get as much rest as I could. We got up about six, didn't have much to do since we were seriously sooo ready. So, we ate breakfast, walked, took a nap, walked, the midwifes were in and out, the girls watched movies... finally things got going just before noon.
While these tenets, over a century old may not be entirely applicable to a hotel in 2011, there must be some sort association, even a vague one, to the great name of Cesar Ritz which is known for luxury and taste. I could not see any sort of fleeting acknowledgement to the history, nor the very definite style of Cesar Ritz, and I wondered if the designers and architects have any understanding or awareness of the Ritz heritage. This hotel is clean, new, and understatedly luxurious. It is also entirely forgettable, and lacks any associations or links with the grand style of a classic Ritz Hotel. In a very large city, with many fine hotels, this is not the hotel I would select for accommodations, a special meal, a reception, a drink, or afternoon tea. In Toronto, the closest one would come to classic Ritz style would be the Beaux Arts King Edward Hotel on King Street, managed by Meridien Hotels.
But I'm willing to play nice. I just asked to join her forum and if I'm allowed (Fat chance) I'm going to ask her about the things we have in our Vatican Vs. God rebuttals we have in the side bar.
“What’ll it be, bud?” He looks down from his great height and smiles. I don’t know why he puts on the lipstick - he doesn’t need it. Grin’s as wide as the Brooklyn Bridge and I should know - I seen it once.
Police Federation of England and Wales
Sudden wake-up. I am literally crying! With in minutes I ran to see my great-father.
“I AM the Assman!”
Love is a fragile thing. The circumstances may have allowed you to fall into place but it is our actions that keep it together. There is always a chance that things can change in an instant. Make the best of what has come your way, and never forget it when its time to move on.
A) Log in to your/create an Amazon.com account
You can serve it as it is but I made Coffee flavoured Swiss Meringue Buttercream to go along with it.
soup is done, cool slightly, for about 10 minutes, then fill each ramekin to within 1/2-inch of the top. (You will have about 2 cups soup remaining; refrigerate and enjoy as leftovers.) Whisk the egg with 1 teaspoon cold water in a small bowl, and brush one side of each pastry circle with some of this egg mixture. Carefully place a pastry round, glazed side down, over each ramekin. Firmly press the overlapping pastry against the outside of each ramekin. Be careful not to press down from the top to avoid cutting the dough on the edge of the ramekin. Press the tines of a fork around the pastry sides to make it
So here’s the question? Do you know what your talents are? Do you
I had the distinct pleasure of attending a lecture the other day at the Naples Philharmonic Center for the Arts. For twenty years now Canadian Literature Professor, Elaine Newton, has been enthralling audiences - at least 200 people were in attendance - with her in-depth reviews of books and authors. Often in the past our customers have brought us Ms. Newton's reading list just to let us know what she was up to (though I sometimes felt they were rubbing it in that we had to work and could never attend). I did feel vindicated when I saw that her tastes mirrored our own.
“It was a hack job,” recalled Maxwell, a childhood friend of Romney who was in the dorm room when the incident occurred. “It was vicious.”
With a love of live television, Brett jumped off the red carpets of Hollywood to join HSN in 2011. His appetite for pop culture is matched by his love of technology. His intellectual curiosity spans from the latest electronics to the newest ideas in health, fitness, and house wares. He has a secret love for country music, historical fiction novels and cats – a strange mixture for sure, but one that keeps viewers guessing what he’ll say next. Brett loves guiding customers in their quest to upgrade and innovate their lives.
3. GEORGE HEADLEY (WI) Right Hand Batsman, Leg Break Bowler (1930-54)
Into eight almost equal portions, well, in a sort of way.
The first four are from the family party.
“This’ll be the farthest I’ve been from Stormwind my whole life,” Creme mused.
In one post he proposes setting up an English Defence League in Norway, saying: “I am very impressed with how quickly they have grown – this has to do with smart tactical choice by ­management.”
:: Saturday Lauren, my sister, my Mom and I ventured down to the Finger Lakes to visit the antiques barn we found last summer while visiting Keuka Lake
Or two book signings same day at the same time, one is your Mother-In-law's favorite author and one is your mother's favorite author, who do you choose?
2 carrots, peeled
The two Sandman characters and Fighting American rank among my favorite comics characters, and many of Simon's one-offs are also favorites. Heck, there are probably comics stories I love that he did and I'm just not aware of or remembering.
7. Bring Microfiber Cloths and Plastic Bags. Indispensable when you’re shooting around spraying water. You can use a plastic bag to cover the camera until you are ready to shoot. Using your lens hood can sometimes keep some of the water droplets (or sun) off the lens as well.
I also like to joke that I have a superpower. For some reason my coworkers love to give me the clothes they don’t fit into any more. I also tend to buy my clothes at thrift stores like crossroads. This saves my wallet in obvious ways, but it also is a huge drain on the environment to grow cotton (a non-food crop) to fill our overstuffed closets.
She scribbled this information on a cocktail napkin and tucked it under the handle of my suitcase. I looked at her and said, “A cocktail napkin? Oh yeah, now I’m full of confidence.”
My Coffee Stop are the latest addition to Venuse. Based at the end of Platform 1, Enfield Chase, the Fairtrade themed coffee shop are pleased to join us and offer free venue space to the social sector.
It is assumed that this is a reference to Bill Miller’s “incubator company” idea. That seems to consist of the following elements.
ZED: a slang term used for zombie
This, my friends, is so disturbing
This is a grand, traditional Victorian pub, and although it's not the style I want to recreate in miniature, David spotted the simple construction of the round wooden tables, which will be easy to replicate in 1:12 scale:
UC Davis Faculty who support the following petition concerning retroactive legal measures taken against student protesters should forward their name and title to petition@cucfa.org:
"Every great dream begins with a dreamer. Always remember, you have within you the strength, the patience, and the passion to reach for the stars to change the world" (or write 50,000 words in a month!)
There is no singular stellar aspect to this place, but everything is above average. Good bartenders, a few beers on tap that we would actually drink, not far from the house, bonus points for regularly having people 55+ enjoying a pint or two, bonus points for having Bob Reeder and other Irish acts from time to time. It looks like a suburban chain restaurant from the outside (which it was in a previous life) but inside is cozy and welcoming. Until we try a couple more places on our list, this is likely our go-to place for a nearby drink.
It is from Showsec about Crowd Management Strategy, and the hard copy is accompanied by a CD.
I also wanted to let you know that the doctor has said that as long as Levi stays healthy over the next week, he doesn’t see why Levi couldn’t attend my sister’s wedding next weekend. As you know from my last post, this was something I was dearly hoping and praying for, and God once again has answered our prayers! We are very excited that he’ll be able to tag along, and Hannah was even able to find him a little tuxedo at the last minute so he could fill the ringbearer role with his cousin like we had originally planned. I am very thankful that God’s timing is perfect, and moments like this make me sit back and wonder why I ever try to drive things to my own timetable when I know things are out of my control yet under the control of the One in whom we trust. So thank you all for your prayers for this special request.
This one is game too. Sort of what you do when you meet and get into Lil' Miss Goody-two-shoes above and she starts to use your toothbrush.
However, business people aren’t privy to the cause of the boom. Unless new money continues to be created and spent in these sectors, the demand will die off and the recent investments will plummet in value. People will be fired. Unemployment skyrockets. Recessions ensue.
Hope all of you are having a great Tuesday so far. Mine has been so productive, which I love! Much better than my Monday. I decided today was a polka dot and wavy hair kind of day. Polka dots make everything better.
getting rid of everything i owned was fabulous and frankly, i’d recommend it to anyone and everyone at least once in your life. but now that i’m trying to accumulate again and have a three bedroom house to fill, it’s hard to just buy things and of course, most of it ends up coming from ikea, which hopefully just doesn’t say anything about me (except that i ain’t got no money).
Here are 5 ways you can avoid BPA exposure every day:
Written by Steven Schnur. Illustrated by Stephen T. Johnson. Ages 4-8.
The 12x12 Tea napkins, I made
I've mentioned before that I tutor North Korean defectors. I've been doing it for a few months now. The whole time I debated whether or not I should mention it here, but I figured there's nothing wrong with encouraging people to do a good thing.
We must ” lay aside,” every weight, everything that would stop us from getting back up again, every sin. Yet, we are not left to our own devices in this. The way that we lay aside that which weighs us down or a sin that would keep us down is by ” looking unto Jesus, the author and the finisher of our faith.” This is the key to weariness, this is the key to every weight that would drag us down, every besetting sin. As we take our eyes off our circumstances, away from everything that holds us down including sin and cast our eyes upon Jesus, then in His presence we are renewed. We must look in the midst of the storm and find Jesus. We must invite Him into the boat. We cannot match our own strength with the strength of the storms that will come against us. We will exhaust ourselves and get no-where.
4. Name
Artificial/Imitation Vanilla FlavoringU.S. manufactured artificial vanilla is produced from synthetic "vanillin", Lignin Vanillin, which is made from wood by-products of the paper iindustry. This by product is chemically treated, with flavor packets, similar to those that scent perfume, to mimic the flavor of vanilla. Discerning palates find the imitation vanilla products to have a harsh quality with a bitter aftertaste. Despite it’s initial low cost it is not really less expensive, as it takes twice as much imitation vanilla flavoring is required to match the strength of pure vanilla extract
So, here's how I did it...
Remember the "weed" boxes in the living room post? well...I had to do something with them...they had such neat detail but were orange and brown...
This is something that a lot of people don’t get but I’ve experienced it first hand in Argentina. When power went down, the closer you were from Buenos Aires the sooner it was restored. Some of the smaller most distant communities would go without water or electricity for weeks. When arsenic was found in the tap water, they took care of it first in Buenos Aires and the larger nearby cities, and it stayed contaminated for years in the smaller towns, the infrastructure repairs needed always being to expensive to do given how few were affected.
And here is my card for this Challenge.
I just love my heroes to go through a lot of passionate emotion. The darker, the more tormented the better. If they’re too stoic, too shiny, their emotional journey doesn’t mean as much to me. If my hero gets pushed right to the very brink of sanity or physical endurance—or both—then where he goes from there, how he picks up the pieces and prevails really stirs my heart.
But when I am writing fiction I sit here with no more noise than the birds outside my window. I live far from other people. I really have to struggle to focus so music, though I love it, is out. In fact everything, including other humans is out. I have a geranium named, Blanca, but she is pretty understanding and quiet.
So, in the B&B case, the judge recognised that he was having to decide between competing rights. Or when civil partners would like a ceremony in a place of worship, how do we relate the “rights” of the parties to the “rights” of the religious believers?
and wet
14So now, go in fear of the Lord, and be his servants with true hearts: put away the gods worshipped by your fathers across the River and in Egypt, and be servants of the Lord.
This is among about 4 other ice cream flavors I've already churned in July - can't wait to share the rest with you later this month!
I even noticed what a lovely day it was. NPR was playing a bit of music from LOTR, the leaves were falling from the trees as I drove underneath and it was almost, dare I say, fucking magical.
Galloway was victorious because he managed to mobilise the local mosques and tap in to local concern about the West trying to prevent Iran from developing a nuclear weapon. Having watched many of his interviews, I am concerned about his views on honour based violence, anti-terror policing and extremist teaching of children in faith schools.
@ Anon & Hopeful Mother: labouring first, then undergoing a C-section
I have been overwhelmed with gratitude at the response my last post generated. The comments and emails I received were so encouraging and loving and I thank all of you for taking the time to just let me know you were there, you heard, and you wished the best for me. I also thank all of you who shared your own stories of abuse and betrayal with me. Those stories are sacred to me and I feel blessed that you trusted me with them.
said the little bunny, “I will be a Magpie, and I will fly away from you.”
DEATHWATCH BEETLE (above left)
As seen from the bridge, this is a view of Punggol Waterway. The Waterplay area with the water cannons and water fountains are on top the hill, next to the “Rustic Bridge” or suspension bridge. While I was there, the water started sprouting around 8.45am. Not sure if that is the usual timing or if they were turned on because a group of kids and their teachers, I assumed, arrived there exactly at that time. The look of joy and excitement on the kids faces were delightful to see.
We women are wonderful, capable, efficient, nurturing souls. : ) Wives, mothers, grandmothers, daughters, sisters, friends, bosses, employees….we can be defined by the many relationships that we have with others. Each of these identities comes with its own set of (often self-imposed) demands.
Pull away from needing meaning; move towards associations, memories.
This year’s event saw a record breaking amount of vessels participate in the afternoon voyage as turnout has increased year on year. In anticipation, organisers provided extra time for those struggling to prepare their craft before casting off from City Road Lock. But organisers ensured that not all tradition was lost, and just as every year that has preceded it, safety measures were neither considered nor implemented for this year’s regatta. Stick that in your pipe and smoke it British Waterways!
Change in the season.
Ostensibly pressing seems like a win-win; we take the pressure off our defenders and get back onto the front foot where we’ve always been comfortable under Wenger.
Creating margin probably means that I won't get Christmas cards out until the end of January, and my house won't be uber-decorated. After all, something has to give. But it will mean I make time for a leisurely visit with my dad at his Alzheimer's facility. And time to volunteer in the church nursery for a holiday-crowded event. And time to invite a new neighbor over for coffee. Hopefully, it will mean that my energy won't get diverted by a frantic, self-imposed agenda. Only by God's agendathe essence of true simplicity.
These are merely fruitless worries and not full blown episodes of anxiety, thank God. I continue to trust that God will equip us with the tools to make it through each day just as he has done every day since the 9th of January. At the end of the day, I’m still human, still susceptible to intermittent bouts of misgivings, yet still human to make the conscious decision not to let them consume me.
One of their most charming antics was their afternoon naps. We kept a small dog house in their pen. Bassets are big dogs, with the exception of their short legs. So the process of stuffing themselves into this little dog house was entertaining. We bought a larger dog house, but they had nothing to do with it. They just kept stuffing themselves into their napping house, with a variety of limbs or body parts hanging out the flap. They were completely content. When Sterling came along, there wasn’t any room for him, so he would drape himself over the top. With paws and tail dangling, he’d nap above our snoring bassets.
2. Rouleaux aux épinards
Which society would you prefer to live in?
-Japanese Photo ((Purikura)) booth
In my Technicolored imagination, the beast was plotting the nearest breach. Any moment, it would plunge into my nostril, feelers smoothed back along its shiny body armor, while prickly legs skittered frantically toward my brain. Lodged up there for the next decade, it would have nothing to eat but my brain matter.
Well, when we got there I was challenged on a number of fronts, primarily the fact that there isn't a whole lot to shoot down there. "Whole lot of nothing" kept running through my head as I peered down at a seemingly endless stretch of white. It was a lovely white, mind you, but still, not terribly photo-worthy. Oh, and Santa's Village was nowhere to be seen. Then there was the photographic impossibility of shooting anything decent through pockmarked plastic windows, through the exhaust stream of a GE90-115B high-bypass turbofan engine (the largest-diameter, highest thrust such commercial engine in history) in the precious few seconds I had before my flatulent, barefoot, privacy-challenged, bathing-challenged seatmate returned from wherever he had gone.
I’m looking at the light, and at the same time, I am not looking at the light. Can you really look at something that is the reason why you can see, and thus is the thing that makes you look instead of you looking at it independently, without its help?
this article provides some details on how gov has been enforcing its censorship of protesters and
By noon, it was coming up to 500. It was then that Pat gave me some wise advice about my blog on the evils of addiction. She said, “stop checking it. You’re addicted.” She told me not to check until a specific time. I think it was 2 p.m.
As scene after scene passes without mishap and we near the end of the first half we start to relax, we begin to exchange smiles, someone's even brave enough to whisper what we've all started to think.
Truth thinks that HHH made the right move here…Ninja please.
There's always a story...so here's the story behind the name....My mom was a part of a Mothers of Multiples group in Texas! The name of the group was 2 is Beautiful. We actually went to Kindergarten with another set of twins and 1 set of Triplets! How cool is that! I guess it was something in that BIG Texas water tower!? lol! After we left Texas the group slowly disbanned as we all grew up and apart.I don't think we have any of the original t-shirts left that my mom had printed - but pretty soon I will offer them in my Etsy shop!
1171 *D-IX/3/1993. “An Odyssey Around the Parliament of the World’s Religions.” First Friday Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1994(9), above, and in Item B-12, above, pp. 345-74 (2002).)
And to all my undeclared or otherwise-occupied friends, a Merry December!
So glad I made that change. It gave so much dimension to the room, plus it was such a quick project I won't feel bad if my ever-changing hormones change their mind (because they have a mind of their own) about it in a few months. :) I think it's here to stay though.
Wine 2010 Telmo Rodriguez Gaba do Xil 13.5%
On top of this she is very beautiful. And knows it. She is poised, articulate, and comes across as very sure of herself. She drives an MG Midget (Cate, “a run-around in dull green with a dent in the wing.”) This is her book and don’t you forget it: she’s talking to you:
My brain is lying to me again. It caught me off guard this time because I wasn't paying attention. It's been minimizing all the positives in my life, and maximizing the negatives. It's been telling me that the world is black and white, and that things are either "all good" or "all bad", with no gray areas in between. It's been telling me that I've failed as a teacher because I let one student down at a time when I was in no position to help her (unbloggable stuff - can't elaborate), and that I'm not good enough to do this anymore. It's been telling me that I've failed as a parent because I can't get through to Katie. It's been telling me that I've failed as a person because I can't shake this feeling of negativity and sadness over Victoria. It's been telling me that I've failed as a brother because I can't save my brother from his own state of depression. And on and on.
The Nusach Arizal as presented by The Baal haTanya – Rabbi Shneur Zalman of Liadi, the first Lubavitcher Rebbe – though it is a kabbalistic prayerbook, was purposefully freed of nearly all the kavannot in order to focus on creating a prayerbook that was appropriate for users of all skill levels. Complicated diagrams and pages of meditation material interspersed within selections of actual prayers were put to rest. Instead his text was complete yet concise, as well as clear and understandable as a true liturgical work. Though the Baal haTanya did not include the meditating upon the form of the menorah, he did prescribe a reading of Psalm 67 and some interesting kavannot relating to it. What made these kavannot so meaningful that he felt compelled to include them?
Mr Bester was able to free himself and proceded to give chase after the men.
Actually, Spooky had let me know about his interest in coffee on the first night my Dad brought him home. He had climbed into my lap and buried his tiny head in my coffee mug. At the time I assumed that his real interest was in the smell of the creamer, but I was wrong: he was after the raw power of caffeine.
Disney’s biggest challenge will be to get enough people enthused about second-string superheroes to justify the price — about $1.2 billion, or 40%, more than what Marvel’s stock was worth when the deal was announced Aug. 31.
For human nature, which alone, according to the similitude in the parable, through vice roamed away from the hundred of rational beings, is, if it be compared with the whole, but an insignificant and infinitesimal part.
I had to sit with this book for a few days after I finished it. I had one of my teachers come to me, book in hand, requesting that I do the read. This teacher had been browsing the Top 100 Notable Books of 2011 and picked this book from the one sentence summary:
ongoing journey and we kind og like it, as long as it stay in perfect alignment
As you breathe-out direct this feeling of strength to families of Brandon, Jason, Juan and Peter
by Avery Brewing – Boulder, CO
And whatever I say, its probably going to seem like the same rambling as last episodes again but that’s the problem here, everything is happening in circles one after the other and it is a killer of interest! Anna is moping, which was the story from the very beginning for her. All she does is glare and glare or pass snide remarks. I really liked her in just three scenes so far. One-when she was nice to Ga Young in America, two-when she stood up to Mama Dearest after she first came to Korea. And the follow up scene when Jae Hyuk comes home and consoles her and three-when she’s with Young Gul, drinking, and admits to loving Jae Hyuk a lot. Other than that, it’s been the same old same old all the time. I am plenty tired of her stupid, boring, same old ‘doing nothing.’ Please writers, make her HUMAN!
Maybelline gel liner
Right this little lovely is off to ebay, need to clear my craft debt - lol.
How to Enter: Submit your entry using the InLinkz tool found at the bottom of this post. Please post your full name along with your entry. Entries are due by 9:00 pm MST on Thursday, August 4th, 2011.
hidden, is the practical (i.e. paradisical) science of eternally eliminating all problem from within, from the radically immanent grounds of a vast and terrifyingly true intuition: that you are the only problem. Or as Laruelle says, “the heretical struggle is not born from terror or the specular-whole, which it practically undoes, it is born from the being-separate of man that is in-Man.”
The summer is a time for a lot of change. The majority of the residence here are students at Creighton. Mostly Dental, and Law, some Medical and a few Physical Therapy. It makes it very sad and also exciting when the summer comes. Many students are graduating and moving out and many are moving in to begin their education.
He will go and find out their names
“The search for a unique identity, either religious, cultural or political, as expressed through special calendars, would give way to the search for a new international identity reflecting and confirming that the world and its people are an interdependent global community.”
If you told me to die for you
And I have little home decor items. No hate to Urban or Anthro, because I super duper love them, but this stuff is certainly one of a kind. Things like mobiles, vases, frames...blah, blah.blah. You get the idea.
It blows your mind.
I have attended a couple of 1940’s themed weekends and had a marvellous time.
We just read in parshat Metzora about the “bayit menuga,” the house which has tzara’at. Tzara’at is the scaly growth, sometimes called leprosy, which can affect skin and clothes and also, houses. And I think that the details of the bayit menuga, and the way the kohen deals with it, teach us something important about the idea of home.
Have a great weekend everyone and play nice with your co-workers… starting tomorrow!
On November 5th, I got up early (5:15 am EST) to check the skies for this event. We had nothing but cloud cover. I was really bummed, but thankful I hadn't woken the girls so they could see "cloud cover".
Duties
So let's see all of those creations coming on through, scrapbook pages, altered items, home decor and cards!
Pre-1972, policy and practice in the Patent Office favored IBM's no-patents-on-software position. Supporting the position was a recommendation in 1966 by a "President's Commission on the Patent System."And who was responsible for the Benson patent? Bell Laboratories of AT&T, one of the few large, non-vendor entities doing independent research applicable to computer programming.
Research a way to either convert VHS to DVD or replace most of the VHS movies.
I’m scared of some foods now, and when I eat them, I panic (in my head), convinced I will now gain all 16 pounds back instantly…yeah, I’m a headcase…
This came hard on the heels of a recent lively discussion on the Colour & Vision Network and Applied Vision Association mailing lists regarding the astounding cost of the journal Experimental Brain Research, published by Springer. The issue was raised by Simon Rushton, Tom Freeman and Petroc Sumner of Cardiff University, who pointed out that the cost to libraries of a yearly subscription to Experimental Brain Research was (at $11,751) roughly 6.2 standard deviations (SD = $1656) above the mean ($1360), which due to the positive skew of the data is actually an overestimate of the representative cost of a Springer journal!
For years my travels have been a great blessing. Travel for me has not been a “special occasion.” It has been, to this day and hour, a way of life. I always tell people that if “you have always wanted to go there” why not go? As I sit writing this in a cafe across from the Louvre – in a city of my dreams – Paris – I reflect on two things in particular.
Finished. If I were working with a live model or a photograph, I'd be influenced a lot more by what I saw. The colors would probably conform more to actual colors, and shapes would likely be based on existing things around the figure.
You may recall that I interviewed indie-published author, Megg Jensen, a few months ago. Having read Megg's first book Anathema (the first book in her Cloud Prophet Trilogy) I found I really enjoyed her strong, character driven, storytelling. And so, as is the way of writers supporting each other (yes, this is what social network marketing is all about), I'm happy to now introduce the new artwork for Megg Jensen’s bestselling novel SLEEPERS.
Mahalo to all who voted for me! Your support, as always, is greatly appreciated!
¼ c rice vinegar
His seventh album ‘Out of the Game’ came out in UK on 23 April, and is coming out today in US, on 1 May 2012. NPR.org (http://www.npr.org/2012/04/22/150736532/first-listen-rufus-wainwright-out-of-the-game?sc=tw&cc=twmp) provided an exclusive First Listen during the last week.
(4)
1/2 teaspoon each salt and pepper, or to taste
2.Donate
In went the hand..... and soon both hands were enjoying spreading the paint and feeling the squelching!
Our design team were super impressed with everyone's creations your all a talented bunch!
I thought the water would feel weightier. That night dad left us. At the door, a drop curving down his wrinkled face, dad said “blood is thicker than most things. You, me, mom, Billy, we all have the same blood. That means something.” I guess dad was wrong. I can’t feel the weight. I can’t feel the meaning. I dumped more than a capful in this water, more spouts from this stranger’s flesh. She whines like us “why” and screams like mom “Please stop!!” while the knife carves fissures in her skin, eroding her.
Better day today! I spent some time looking over the PINK message boards on excercise.com and it was nice to see some feedback from all angles. Some folks are losing faster than I am, some are slower. Lots of folks complaining about headaches too. I found some answers to questions I'd asked myself.
Once when I expressed my wonder at how Sandro seemed to already have a lot of control over his left hand while soloing on piano, he told me that he had been ‘doing it for a long time already’ since he ‘was a drummer’ and it was ‘already in’ him. Eventually your body becomes the conduit for the music within – the means by which you experience the pleasure of performance, invention and communication.
- I have connected with a TON of other soon-to-be Congo mamas!
All of its is in you,
And . . . drum roll, please . . . Bowker estimates that they will issue 15,000,000 ISBN numbers in 2012.
so have you seen the new commercials for jc penney? they are acutally really funny, and star
i lend you my ears
Pamela swears they are actually dogs, but I kept one eye cocked for these 2 to unzip their Muppet outfits. They really are these amazing creatures in little fur suits!
Armed only with her trusty whip, her always improving German accent, and her trademark ample bosom, Greta (Dyanne Thorne), tired of torturing for the betterment of humanity (conducting medical experiments on prisoners of war is so last season), has decided to start inflicting pain on others for profit and political reasons. You see, the country she currently resides has enemies–and, judging by the number of women languishing in "the hole," it has a lot of enemies–and thanks to Greta, she has ways of making them talk. If you think about it, her mistreatment of dissidents makes sense (it's an excellent way to ingratiate yourself to a new government), but how does one earn money from degradation? Why, that's simple, you film the degrading acts with a hidden camera and sell the footage to unscrupulous pornographers.
Catchy title, right? I do what I can.
Glitter: Ranger Stickles
“Oh come off it.”
Each week I am introducing one or two of the Presidents to the kids. I made the master worksheet, but used portraits I found on homeschoolshare.com. I also got the facts from Homeschool Share. The kids have to cut and glue the portrait, color the frame, and fill in the information. I write the four year-old's info in gray and he traces it (sometimes). Here's an example of one of his pages.
Then I saw a new heaven and a new earth; for the first heaven and the first earth passed away, and there is no longer any sea. And I saw the holy city, new Jerusalem, coming down out of heaven from God, made ready as a bride adorned for her husband … and He will wipe away every tear from their eyes; and there will no longer be any death; there will no longer be any mourning, or crying, or pain; the first things have passed away.” Revelation 21:1,2,4 (NASB)
This Autism Positivity Flash Blog Event is the brainchild of Thinking About Perspectives, a group of bloggers committed to increasing autism awareness and acceptance via open and respectful dialogue. We are: 30 Days of Autism, Outrunning the Storm, The Third Glance, Aspie Kid, Flappiness Is, Quirky and Laughing, Life on the Spectrum, Fairy Tale Forgotten, The Aspie Side of Life, and Inner Aspie.
Last week the Missouri House wasted the people’s precious legislative time debating a resolution opposing the Obama administration’s contraception coverage mandate. The resolution was yet another overt pander to the powerful Catholic lobbyists who seem to have more pull under the dome than the majority of Missourians who support birth control coverage without a co-payment. During the debate several women Representatives stood up to speak up and…well, represent their districts in support of birth control coverage and in opposition to the panderfied resolution.
In the ’sixties the Out Islands were where you went only if you had your own airplane, your own private yacht or a friend’s to lift you there magically from the communications hub in Nassau. Nowadays major airlines flew into both Nassau and Grand Bahama where Freeport acted like any airport in the world–faceless, impersonal. In its opaque glass air lounges you could be anywhere.
This episode of SVU involves sex, lies, manipulation, and all around awful behavior. Which is all pretty standard here, but in this case it’s coming from an unexpected source. And that’s…still pretty standard here.
Like the "must place" student who had to be assigned to our class, even if the classroom was full, because they were homeless...
pistachios for garnishing
potty wasn't possible, the potty training was leaving
Here is a bloke who has never been able to walk a step in his life, but Peter testifies to the crowd which gathers when this same fella starts jumping around praising God (v8) that his strength has come through faith in the name of Jesus.
in technicolor
another war
All I Want for Christmas (1991) ... AMC ... 3:15 AM
Here she is -
Stoic and stone cold.
So it seems that James had fallen on hard times after the death of his mother in 1905 and taken up the charitable offer of passage to a new land and a new start in life.
- When I was in the late stages of writing my first book, I listened to the Into the Wild soundtrack on repeat every day. Especially “No Ceiling.” But I was surprised to find that I can’t listen to it while I write my current book, because it takes me back to the way I felt when I was writing the first book, which is not the same as the way I feel when I am writing this book. I don’t know if that makes sense, but it made me sort of happy.
Crumbled crackers, (ritz work well in this) bread crumbs or additional cheese for topping (optional)
First up, for those of you in Utah, I'll be at the Orem library tomorrow (Wed the 21st) night at 7:00 pm.
MIAMI, FLORIDA April 30, 2012 – RealtorÒ Rick Burch with Burch & Associates International in Miami Beach, Florida has earned the At Home with Diversity certification from the National Association of Realtors.
1 quart plain low-fat yogurt
Why am I in a childrens hospital, you ask? There are only a few accredited CF centers in Ohio and Akron is the closest to where we live, so I go to that center, which is connected to Akron Childrens Hospital. There is an adult wing at the hospital and I'm in that wing. I've been in plenty of hospitals in my life and if I have to be in a hospital, I'm glad I'm here! Everyone has been fantastic so far! And now I'm finished for the day and it's time to sleep so I can start all over in the morning!
This batch is a blend of a pull off the solera and fresh, non-soured beer. The solera was refilled with the fresh beer that did not go into the bottle. Straight solera beer could have stood on its own and would have been fantastic. But I wanted something with a sweet-sour balance for summer slurping.
2010.07.25 Algeria Kabylie 1 8 A suicide bomber murders a night watchman.
I wanna have a cat. Because I really love Cats. Especially Abyssinian and American short hair.
Have you ever felt like you were a small cog in a big machine?
However, there are important alternatives for financing a Job Insurance program that should be considered – especially as we think of how to construct a jobs bill without triggering an internal struggle with our party’s “deficit hawks.”
I was taught that is what our lives are like. In Ephesians 2: 10 we are told that God is creating a masterpiece in our lives.
Someday, when this night is over
I apologize profusely to ALL of you for just leaving without so much as a "thank you".
But no more. I make no resolution to blog every day. I don't have the time, and I'm far more interested in substance than quantity. However, I plan to blog on lots of different stuff now, including my art, music, sewing, etc. I have a tentative weekly schedule for this, but I'll let you guess what it is (today's should be obvious from the title above). Just know that on any given day you might find something new, and if you don't like it, just check back later.
In a sleepy village in the Shire, a young hobbit is entrusted with an immense task. He must make a perilous journey across Middle-earth to the Cracks of Doom, there to destroy the Ruling Ring of Power – the only thing that prevents the Dark Lord’s evil dominion.
5.Saffron : a pinch.
I’m resting now; turned the TV off. Trying to get over the headache I developed watching two of the cable news shows: MSNBC and CNN.
with their business
Also I want to give you the link to a site where a beautiful horse named Jack shares his astounding “old soul” wisdom http://jeanrockefeller.com/jacks-corner.html.
At Country Gourmet Home we offer numerous different fragrances for our wickless wax melts. Shane and Amy carefully measure and add the same amount of fragrance to every melt to insure consistent quality. The amount of fragrance throw is mostly dependent on the fragrance chosen. Not all fragrances have the same throw. Different individuals have different tastes in fragrances. I am often asked what my favorite fragrance is. My favorite fragrance is not always our company’s bestselling fragrance. Some individuals enjoy a musk smell, while others do not. Some like a flower smell, while others like a baked goods smell or a fruit smell. We sell a pineapple upside down cake fragrance that smells just like the real thing baking in the oven. One of my friends told me once that she was melting the pineapple upside down cake melt in her warmer when her son stopped by for a visit. The son stayed and sat for a while visiting. Finally, after a bit, he turned to her and asked when the cake would be done baking. He honestly thought she had a pineapple upside down cake in the oven. We also have a fragrance called doodle bug, which is a fun fragrance that is an exciting combination of cream soda, fresh watermelon slices, hubba bubba bubblegum with just a hint of newborn baby.
The call of the wild is something sweet…
Another year of Finch's Holiday Time Boutique! Whew! We had SUCH a great turn out - thanks to everyone who attended, purchased lovely items, and to those who MADE those lovely items. What a success!
I colored my bunny from Smeared Ink with my pencils and gave her some red eyes..
and mulled...
1 cup whipped cream, chilled
Yeah, we all homeschool the same way. But homeschooling looks pretty different in each unschooling household. Actually, homeschooling looks pretty different for each unschooling kid.
by Ed Brubaker & Sean Phillips, 2003-2005
One afternoon we were driving up the highway outside of Langley. I was reading a magazine - the Smithsonian I think - and I was chatting to Kirk about an article discussing the greatest achievement of modern medicine: the successful campaign against smallpox. Wasn't it amazing, I said, the way the WHO had managed it, wasn't it wonderful that the world was safe now from a disease that had been a deadly threat for thousands of years. Very quietly, his hands stiff on the wheel, he said 'it's not gone.'
Nik simply nodded. He had, indeed, built up quite an infamy for hunting saberslingers—as he called them—on both sides of this seemingly never-ending conflict of religion. The only thing that mattered for him when it came to Light Side or Dark Side was the color of the lightsaber he would be collecting as a trophy. True, Sith were more apt to resort to flinging lightning at him, but there were defenses against that sort of thing.
How can I get involved with Babyloss? - The babyloss website is run by volunteers, who give up their time to support other bereaved parents, organise fundraising and remembrance events, and update the website.
About SnoreRX Pillow Liners
I have been a stay at home mom for 5 1/2 years now. Basically since I began I have been cutting out things in life that once were and dropping commitments to make more room for the care our growing family has needed.
It had razor-sharp edges, and cat-like stealth in its perfectly camouflaged position, nestled in the carpet. The bite was absolute. The seizure inducing pain lingered, my attempts to hop and wiggle the agony away in vain.
You can pound the slices yourselves with back of you knife.
We all say we spend too much time in meetings, yet meetings are supposed to provide an efficient forum where everyone gets together to make a decision when otherwise nothing will happen. So where are we all going wrong?
Instead our elder generation is reduced to losing their dignity because no-one considers them at the design stage.
When it’s your own love that opens you it can be an amazing feeling – to be able to give of yourself that much. It can also be scary if you don’t know how to give love, without giving yourself away. You didn’t necessarily choose to love this person, they just came along and suddenly someone was “singing your life with their words.” It will feel magical all the same though, however they touched you…the good spots, the bad spots…because they opened you. And if you feel genuine love for them…you will be at your softest, most gentlest behavior. It’s a place we could all do with visiting more often.
East Midlands Trains are on my mind right now. Scenario is this. Happy for them to take 56£ for a single first class ticket from Sheffield to London. Happy to check all tickets. But not happy to actually provide a train that has the right amount of carriages . End result train is packed and luggage is obstructing the aisles. Have I mentioned the broken toilets also? None working that I can find. I will never travel on this awful railway again. The staff are doing their bit but what really can they do. Little in the way of food or drink either free or to buy. The free wi-fi managed to hijack all my top sites and I can assure you that East Midlands railway are bottom in more ways than one. They also apparently are having industrial action next tuesday to thursday, but with this awful level of non-customer service, how will we know the difference? But as I repeat happy to take our money.
Still, these really are minor quibbles about what is a tremendously-important and well-overdue book. Holmes’ attempt to discern the present reign of the Word is among the best introductions to theological ethics that I have read. I commend it warmly and enthusiastically.
-Mark Driscoll
Accountancy Shanty
I hear you sayin’ that you’ll never make it
The character gaining The Deck of Not a Lot of Things may draw up to five cards, but must announce how many cards will be drawn prior to drawing the first card. As soon as one of the cards is drawn from the deck, its magic is bestowed upon the person who drew it, for better or worse.
Teal: Miles 20-23, I knew the hills were coming and I heard a guy say next to me at about 20 that we have 1.5 more miles of hell then it’s easy. 1.5- OK I can do 1.5 just get me there! I was ok. I saw the hooters tent at 20.5 and knew I only had 1mile left to get over the hills. Then comes the signs “You are now entering the Dolly Parton hills” I see the dudes dressed up as Dolly and for the first time in a while I have an emotion other than fear of failure. I smiled at the guy and he ran with me up one of the short hills. PRAISE JESUS- I would have stopped if this crazy dude with his hanging out hairy belly hadn’t run/cheered me on. I assume he saw the fear in my face.
That old Leftist, John B. Judis, has an article in The New Republic that summarizes a stream of psychological research into fear of death that goes by the name of "worldview defense". The idea is that if you are reminded of your own mortality, you become more conservative.
Here is what it includes:
It is not a contradiction for me since I do eat meat several times per month – very lean meat and seafood. We buy directly from farmers who raise elk and deer for meat. They are there at the Calgary Farmers’ Market, along with the bison ranchers. We only have this meat several times annually since it is not cheap but in Alberta, the quality is excellent and it is locally raised.
Also the road that originally looked quite far was in actual fact a lot further away than first thought.
Here is the second on my entries into my own book! It is great to think this has travelled round the northern hemisphere from Moscow to Tokyo to Ontario and back. I have said it before and I'll say it again, this is one of the few times I actually look forward to receiving post since I have been an adult. Every time I get one I have a little flutter in my stomach.
Well, wouldn’t you know it… I actually… got HIRED. Yes! Yours Truly is officially a Rothman Institute employee. Yup, I made it guys! All of my hard work, every moment of social life, and every date I have had to blow off to do homework — yes, it has been ALL worth it. The hours of my internship I spent getting to know all of the awesome people who have helped me with everything… have been nothing but amazing.
permit foul years to wear
admitting, ‘I’m tired now. I’m off to bed.’
Silver: Kentucky Weissbier, Alltech’s Lexington Brewing Co., Lexington, KY
For now, the original insanity blanket in all it's gloriousness!
Well friends, just found out about this: Roseanne Cash presenting a radio documentary about Bobbie Gentry. No idea if it’s good – I just found it – and I can’t imagine it’s anything but superficial but since it’ll vanish off that BBC iPlayer doohickey next Monday, thought I’d get to telling you about it.
We moved to another location.
Raymond Williams took his journey on a bus, Storey occasionally arrives in a Rolls Royce, grandly stepping out to declare it a charabanc: ‘Ceci n’est pas une Roller!’ He describes the increasing visibility of opera in advertising, on film soundtracks, tracing this back to the invention of opera as art, in nineteenth-century Manchester. He collapses the continuing distinctions between art and entertainment, rightly seeing the danger in elitist discourses. Storey then describes how ‘the sixties’ are articulated in an imaginary form, in and through the 1990s. Key to this is understanding how some seriously edgy narratives get channelled into consumerism for profit. This could be what Marcuse called, in that notorious mouthful, ‘repressive desublimation’, only Storey allows for agency at the same time as he accounts for the entertainment market’s unstoppable assimilation, on permanent cruise control. ‘Agency’ here is a kind of lower-case ‘resistance’, the often-overlooked caveat to Foucault’s work.
It's been an interesting conversation, but I'd like to tie it in with one other thing:
Spread some cream cheese, farmer's cheese, goat cheese on the other side.
and all over the United States. The shows became as famous as the man himself. In 1896, Cody founded the town of Cody, Wyoming and was instrumental in the success of the settlement by using his money for an elaborate irrigation system, funding businesses, and mines. He is remembered today in the town with his name sake and places such as the Buffalo Bill Historical Centre, The Buffalo Bill Dam, and the Buffalo Bill State Park.
I am innocent and I have been set free I no longer have chains around my feet And no matter where I go or what they say I am innocent
We believe sexual intercourse during menstruation is an evil practice (Leviticus 18:19-30).
Amazon.com, Inc. today announced that The Wylie Agency is publishing 20 books from some of literature's most influential authors through its new Odyssey Editions imprint (http://www.odysseyeditions.com/) and making them available for sale exclusively in the Kindle Store (www.amazon.com/kindlestore). This is the first time any of the titles--which include Norman Mailer's "The Naked and the Dead," Philip Roth's "Portnoy's Complaint" and Ralph Ellison's "Invisible Man"--have been available electronically, and all of the books are exclusive to the Kindle Store for two years. Starting today, customers can download these books for $9.99 from the Kindle Store and read them everywhere--on their Kindle, Kindle DX, iPhone, iPod touch, BlackBerry, PC, Mac, iPad and Android devices.
10. MB by Brigid
So here I am taking the last hand quilting stitch on my Circus Stars Quilt !!! I have it bound, labeled and washed now and neatly folded away from cat hair until I can get my daughter to help me get some nice pictures. More to follow.
water - 1 1/2 to 2 cups
However this afternoon, with friends, I managed a last foray into the beautiful gentle green countryside that surrounds the Humber basin before the autumn proper arrives and walking becomes too difficult in this rural setting of hills and small forests.
Match making services are one thing very much near on-line courting because they’ll be serving to to bring two people together however they don’t simply should be in the identical country. Two folks may very effectively be on the other facet of the world from one another however that shouldn’t cease love. The internet is going to permit everyone discover new friends and new love and a whole lot of the time, the websites could have a free registration period but then after a week’s trial will cost a fee.
“My daddy makes them.” Smiling, Emily talked with her mouth full, her head looking at the food in front of her. “He puts chocolate chips in them and that….”
may well be two years old which is why I was able to
A wait-and-see attitude seems to be prevailing in the more recent case.
Decentralization. I would not be in favour of one huge, centrally designed website for all our math publishing and peer review needs, possibly with one numerical scale to rank us all. To be clear: I think that arXiv is great. I don’t hang out much on Math Overflow, but I’m glad that it’s there and I would have likely become a heavy user if it had been introduced a few years earlier. What I would not welcome is the mixing of different functionalities and rankings, the assigning of numerical scores to apples and oranges alike. If you don’t see why this could be a problem, I might suggest reading this first:
This leaves me with the feeling that if I take pieces of my own history as solved, closed cases, I will be denying the value of what I haven’t seen yet – back then and henceforth – and the value of how my future will change my perception of my past, which in turn may dictate my present actions.
Summer means drive-in movies... we love these outings... eating dinner in the truck bed full with couch cushions and blankets and then anxiously awaiting the start of the movie - Cars 2. i wish we did more of these with the boys, we always think about it too last minute and I veto the event - next summer I will make sure we go more then once, it's so much less expensive than a movie theater and the atmosphere cannot be beat!
Wendy Lement, who holds a Ph.D. in Educational Theatre from New York University, is Associate Professor and Director of the Theatre Program at Regis College. A playwright and director, she co-founded Theatre Espresso in 1992, a company that brings historical plays to schools, museums and courthouses. Her first children’s fiction book, Keri Tarr: Cat Detective, was published by Breakaway Books in 2004.She is co-author of And Justice for Some: Exploring American Justice through Drama and Theatre, published by Heinemann Press (2005). She has directed thirty productions at Regis, which include “Dancing at Lughnasa,” “Importance of Being Earnest,” “The Good Woman of Setzuan,” “Goodnight Desdemona (Good Morning Juliet),” and “Steel Magnolias” (which won a Moss Hart Award). Her production of The House of Bernarda Alba won the 2000 New England Region's American College Theatre Festival, which was sponsored by the Kennedy Center. Her plays include: “Woman with the Red Kerchief,” “Salem's Daughters, King George III vs. Ruth Blay,” “Voicings: The Story of the Rosenberg Case,” “Dolphins: The Myth of Persephone,” “The Legend of the Christmas Rose,” and “Keri Tarr: Cat Detective,” which is based on her children's book, and won the American Alliance for Theatre and Education's 2002 Unpublished Playreading Project.
There are historical discoveries regularly coming to light that continue to support the accuracy of the Bible. Merrill Unger, who compiled a Bible dictionary wrote, “Old Testament archeology has rediscovered whole nations, resurrected important peoples, and in a most astonishing manner filled in historical gaps, adding immeasurably to the knowledge of Biblical backgrounds.”
It is in this way that all illusions and lies that each person has been telling themselves are seen for what they are and when this happens, a change to a better way of relating takes place
Today we are looking at Acts 22:23. The great crowd of angry Jews interrupted the preaching of the apostle Paul when he mentioned that God sent him to the Gentiles.
I am forever yours, my love.
house, which I'm sure is why we dyed
28. “Each person’s task in life is to become an increasingly better person.” -Leo Tolstoy
And then he would slowly walk up the block towards Avenue C.
I fell in love with this charming, little ampersand the moment I saw it. I knew I wanted one for our living room. The problem was that it was only 12" tall. That size wasn't going to cut it. I needed it bigger. Like double the size bigger. So I decided to replicate, enlarge, and hope I could actually pull it off.
8. Eff this. Just love this one, it is essentially swearing by not saying the actual swear word.
Here on my Egyptian couch
Part 4: The Dream
Basic Computer Knowledge(MS Word, MS Excel, Email)
Gingrich: we’ve worked very hard to
After Thought:: I have learned that the “eff this” schedule is not necessary. THE. RULES. ARE. THE. ANSWER. The days that you just can’t get it together or the days that you really need to spend just enjoying your kids, do what you need to do to follow the rules and keep your peace. We have to do this challenge with LOVE and with a sense of calm or we miss the point. If you are feeling panicky it is because you are not following the rules (at least this has been my experience), the first being the most important.
Manuel sang a son to Tiffany! It was beautiful!
wise enough to truly appreciate him.
Dick Dale: Shake 'n' Stomp
Bad Penny is a brown ale and a pretty good one at that. Pours a dark brown, more like a porter than a brown ale, with a creamy off white head. Smells of dark chocolate and coffee. The taste reminds me a bit like a chocolate soda, it has this thin malty flavoring with a hint of nutty/hoppy bitterness at the end.
Slow loris
When Omega arrives, Humanity will have reached the finite limit of the capacity of the body. It is then, McKenna predicted, we will “‘make it with machines’!: These machines are time compressors; they give us a false sense of eternity.”
Monsoon season is rather interesting. Many Westerners think of it as non-stop rain for six months, which is not true. In fact, the normal cycle is to have moments when the sky gets dark and foreboding. Then the sky literally splits asunder and water falls so fast it doesn’t even bother to form drops. This normally lasts about 10 or 15 minutes, and usually occurs just before sunrise or just after sunset.
animate the ground
Maternal & Child Health Nurse
Rock, paper, scissors. Simple enough game: you shake your hand down 3 times chanting “Rock, paper, scissors” and then pick your weapon of choice. Rock beats scissors, scissors beats paper, paper beats rock.
..... thank you, Amaranthine, for making my day:
CE: Which poetry series have been members of the circuit?
-Psalm 18:2
Wait before you donate! The expert personal trainers at Fitness Together are ready to help you spring into action and finally meet your goal of fitting back into your “skinny jeans.” Starting in April, we will be kicking off the Spring season by hosting the Great Jeans Challenge – an eight week fitness program focused on helping you drop two sizes so you can look better and feel better in a smaller wardrobe.
dimmu borgir Spektrum Oslo Norway 2011
In order to formulate the technical problem, one studies the application (or the patent), the closest prior art and the difference (also called "the distinguishing feature(s)" of the invention) in terms of features (either structural or functional) between the invention and the closest prior art and then formulates the technical problem. The "objective technical problem" means the aim and task of modifying or adapting the closest prior art to provide the technical effects that the invention provides over the closest prior art.
- Unable to hear God’s voice
This week and next Creative Charms is helping to raise breast cancer awareness. Now through October 31st all net proceeds of all sales will go to the Susan Koman Foundation in Chris Hertel's name. To help raise breast cancer awareness we are offering a pink kit in honor of Chris.
2-25-2012
We are so thrilled that you all our jumping on board with the backpacks for the orphaned street kids being taken with the International Voice of the Orphan June 2012 GO Team.
Half a mile beneath the picturesque village of Amieira, Oleiros, is Moses (meaning many millstones in Portuguese) where you will find old cascading terraces, olive trees, grapevines, newly planted fruit orchards and kitchen gardens, three restored stone houses and two streams that gush through the middle.
JUSTIN: How did you get cast in Roger Corman's L.S.D morality tale, PSYCH OUT?
Following are the 15 bloggers and it was really difficult for me to choose them as mostly all the bloggers are been recieving this award so please if you have recvd the award kindly let me know so that i can pass it to some other fellow bloggers .
Every time I put my money in
Heat pan and lightly fry both sides in oil.
The first was Design Den in the Curve gallery in the Barbican foyer - modern, design-led, with an interesting range of products ranging from the supercool to the quirky - and the source of one or two interesting and unusual presents for me to tuck into the family Christmas stockings.
But as the Salon’s popularity grew, so did the unusual requests. Noblemen came asking for wax sculptures of their mistresses, women wanted models of their newborn infants, and – most importantly – the king’s sister herself wanted Marie to come to Versailles to be her wax tutor. While this was, in many ways, a dream come true for Marie, it was also a dangerous time to be associated with the royal family. Men like Robespierre, Marat, and Desmoulins were meeting at Marie’s house to discuss the future of the monarchy, and when the Revolution began, Marie found herself in a precarious position. Ultimately, she was given a choice by France’s new leaders: to preserve the famous victims of Madame Guillotine in wax, or be guillotined herself.
If you hop and leave comments in the next three days, you have a chance to win a random drawing from all the comments on all the blogs to win one of four prize packages worth $40 each!! Winners will be announced on the Sweet 'n Sassy blog on Saturday, November 12th. The more you comment, the better your chance of winning!
Finally, I do not believe anyone should ever feel obligated to forgive. If an ex-gay leader approaches me directly and says, “I am sorry,” I am free to respond, “Yes, and you have good reason to be. Now do something about it.” This may sound harsh, but in pursuing restorative justice, peace does not come about by overlooking wrongs. It requires action–amends–a necessary step that not only acknowledges those who have been oppressed, but may also lead to the liberation of oppressors weighed down by their cruel and misguided beliefs and actions.
This is what you will have. The little bit of left over cardstock can be used later on for matting if you wish.
So in an attempt to put a little pep in my step today,
“Yes, perhaps he finds them more romantic than beds. It was clear that it wasn’t a premiere with me! Why does one allow cats to do almost everything!”
OK! We know and agree about some of Confidence’s definitions and uses. Let’s move on.
She'd got several blasts, she'd twenty-seven masts
-NO! Turuan ng leksyon. Buruhin ang career! 52%
Next row: K6. Turn.
Biggest I’ve got is Philly.
The “good days” come when someone professes Jesus as Savior. Those days make walking through the hard ones possible.
With this being said, I argue it is not the schools that are decreasing rigor, but the personal motivation of the students themselves. Through the great democratization of college, many students are pursuing higher education simply because it is the “next step” rather than out of a personal desire for greater knowledge. Students who are unprepared and unmotivated for the college setting are creating schedules that allow for minimal effort. The statistics are resulting from a change in the student, not the university.
And both were fulfilled by Yeshua as we read in Matthew and in Yochanan (John):
Against truth
Inside readers will find 29 poems about a range of food chain topics. The introductory poem, "What's for Dinner," explains why animals must find food. What follows are humorous, graphic, scientific, inventive and just downright fun poems. Accompanied by equally graphic and humorous illustrations, the perfect pairing of word and art gives us a book that readers will love.
Gym Membership: for our cost comparison, I’m going to use 24 hour fitness’ “24 Hour Fitness Active” monthly price out of San Francisco.
The Leadership Conference, based in Silver Spring, Md,, represents about 57,000 religious sisters and offers programs ranging from leadership training for women’s religious orders to advocacy on social justice issues. Representatives of the Leadership Conference did not respond to requests for comment.
Mary Elizabeth Nelson's story of Catla and the Vikings is rich in the essences of 11th century England. The tangible attributes of the houses' roof thatch, to the beer and drinking horns, and the weaponry and clothing are woven through the text, providing a background of authenticity and lushness to Catla's and Covehithe's stories. But it's the language of her characters at which Mary Elizabeth Nelson excels. I don't want to be a gull (i.e., so trusting and naive) but the descriptive names for common objects or events (e.g., "short-shadow meal" for lunch; "Longest Day celebration" for the Summer Equinox) harmonize with the setting of Catla and the Vikings while enhancing the historical account (fictional, of course) of modest communities defeating invasions by their infamous foes. If Mary Elizabeth Nelson is encouraged to follow up Catla and the Vikings (and there are so many directions she could take that sequel), she will find her stories successfully filling a middle grade niche that doesn't plunge or even cusp into the young adult realm.
My list of things to do is staggering today. Almost as staggering as it was yesterday.
Since having my daughter I have thought a lot about friendship. Who will she form bonds with? Where will she meet them? Will they support her through the worst times when her parents simply will not do? I moved to another part of the country when I was 14 so I have no childhood friends to speak of and it's something I would really love for her: To grow up in one place, and if she is lucky, to always have a piece of her childhood in a lifelong friend. I know what a rarity this can be. Since graduating and starting a family and simply growing up, our friends are alot more spaced out than they used to be and I have really been missing sharing their lives with them. Over the next few weeks we have visitors every weekend and I'm so excited to spend time with some of the best people I know!
Just as we have given up, a man comes over and says that Ian Hays is actually now sitting at his table, so we can sit there after all. We forget about being insouciant and break into a run as we head towards Ian Hays’ table – ha! No longer Ian Hays’ table, but our table – just in case anyone else has overheard. Triumphantly, Mrs L sits down and claims ownership.
GIVE IT TO US! WE NEEDS IT!
Type: All grain Size: 11 gallons
the swing is a pretty black wrought iron freestanding one,
So this is Wüllners Braumeister Landbier, hailing from the west German town of Bielefeld (or does it?) and like its Distelhaus colleague is a vaguely dunkelish amber-to-brown lager. The nose offers up toffee and molasses, shot through with a very German grassy hops complexity. The big fizz subsides very quickly leaving only a vague sparkle to the beer.
Today I forgot this was the day of his anniversary.
And a new month means one thing...The Mystery Agent Contest! *throws streamers* I can promise you that a fantastic agent is waiting to read your pitches.
That is wrong.
I rate No 7 and Poppy King's History lipstick 8/10
I’ve had shows where this has worked, because I’ve kept the tension up in the room, and used the occasion. Equally, I played a show not that long ago, where an attempt was made and I still couldn’t remember the words (I must be getting old, hehe) and I failed to accept the moment I was in, by reacting to it appropriately.
For a woman who wanted nothing more than to be a good wife and mother, I find myself incredibly disappointed in myself. I am trying not to blame myself for my physical illness but I do. I understand that there are much worse things in life, and I am fortunate not to have to deal with them. But for me, my children’s lives come first and if I am not there at full capacity to guide them, to drive them, to go with them, than I feel that I am somehow disappointing them.
My Thinking Slimmer weight loss goals for this week are -
Each time we honor the Passover — remembering Christ, our ‘passover’— and follow God’s decree to bring a sacrificial offering to Him during that time, we are tapping into the supernatural flow of these seven blessings.
I'm having a real hard time getting used to this Mac keyboard. Something keeps happening and the cursor jumps back into the middle of a sentence I already wrote and so I end up writing a sentence within a sentence. That is, IF it doesn't somehow mysteriously delete what I had written previously first. It's happened about five times in the past five minutes. I either type too fast or I am losing my aim. I dunno but some wrong buttons are definitely getting pressed.
Tomato, basil, and flax crackers from “The everything raw foods cookbook”
Today is a gift.
GISBREWMASTER
Anyway we now have once again this essential piece of kit and will be back to our normal blogging selves. Reviews now need to be typed up (lots of them) and comments replied to (sorry that's been slack)
With this, it’s a cry for help from India and we have to aid her coz she’s our mother and she needs help.
Rocky (1976, dir. John Avildsen) , the movie is as much a part of the lexicon of American masculinity as Patton or Die Hard—just a better film. The idea of that with hard work and a belief in oneself, “nothing is impossible,” is infectious. The fact that this optimistic film resonated powerfully in the wake of Vietnam, Watergate, and a recession in 1970s is testament to it the endurance of American optimism and the purity of the message.
With this reputation for obstinacy and a history of foot-dragging in the face of U.S. pressure to compromise, the Likud party's electoral slogan "Together We Will Succeed" rings hollow. Refusing to negotiate with the Palestinian Authority or to even accept the notion of an independent Palestinian state means that Netanyahu's faction views "success" as one of two things: either that the current status quo — Qassam rocket bombardment and kidnapped Israeli soldiers — represents success; or that the Palestinians will cease to be a demographic problem for the Jewish state. Hoping for the latter means that the Likud either indulges in fantasy (that the Arabs under Israeli rule will voluntarily relinquish their national aspirations and accept
It's finally here! The Book a Week with Jen eBook! Thanks to everyone who supported this project, both when I first started writing it in 2007 and those talented pros who helped the actual eBook happen.
As mummies in the mummy-cloth are wound.
Everyone wants to live life on their own terms but this is often easier said than done. Family or societal pressures sometimes prevent people from carrying out their real dreams. It’s time to live life the way that you want to live it.
We don't see the person before.......
or very insecure,
(I’m not dissing my mother. She made homemade meals every single day and did her best with the nutrition information that was out there in the ‘60s and ‘70s, when I grew up. She also was a superb baker, but we won’t go into sugar here…)
I have officially put a $115 deposit down on our local YMCA so
Then the front wheel and hub assembly is innovative. usually the front wheel is prevented from rotating on the hub by four or so drive pins. In fitting the wheel during pitstops, the holes in one need to correspond with the drive pins in the other. Thus four drive pins means the wheel will fit the hub in four orientations each 90-degrees apart. Thus the more drive pins the less the mechanic has to rotate the wheel to fit it to the hub. This year Force india have specially made wheels with a splined detail, to match that on the hub. I can around 20 splines on the wheel suggesting the wheel will fit in one of 18 positions. making the aim of the sub three second pitstop that little bit easier.
I wasn't meaning to chat today but I wanted to mention Amy Thomas and her new book, Paris My Sweet: A Year in the City of Light and Dark Chocolate...I just finished reading her wonderful memoir ... (how delicious was my lazy Saturday night curled up in bed reading...)
-‘Loves Me’ by Maeve Gormley, Sinead O’Loughlin, Shane McDermott (World Premiere)
Hope everyone had a lovely Thanksgiving, and that you aren't too burnt out on shopping to make it to next weekend's
YIHAAAAA! I am back!
V shook her hand. V's mother, shook her hand. And I?? What did I do?
Himanshu Bhatt said the country’s mainstream media has no choice but to expand its scope of coverage to stay relevant in the wake of the growing cyber space media.
Romans 13:4
By Mariam Mokhtar
On the Friday, I had to take the car in first thing to the garage. The bit hadn’t arrived. Surprise. So it was Tesco for me and then home, drowning in bags to find F12, sitting in his pyjamas and a long Wee Willie Winkie hat, watching “The Simpsons,” a worrying mug of hot chocolate slopping about cheerfully above the pale carpet.
In the Blood by Better Than Ezra
He coughed and shot her a wide-eyed glance.
Klaus Peter, 1960-2011
The memory of you keeps calling after me like a rolling train.
The Daily Post offers up topics about which to write when you’re looking for inspiration for your daily blog posts. One struck my fancy a few days ago.
You may or may not have noticed that my blog remained rather silent this week. I actually did write a post for Wednesday, but I didn’t like it and didn’t feel comfortable posting it, so I didn’t. It was actually quite liberating to make that decision and be okay with it. I considered coming up with something else, but I simply did not have the time or the motivation. It has just been one of those weeks. Hopefully all of you understand and can forgive me.
The Delinquent wears its name on its sleeve. You get what you would expect from a journal named The Delinquent. Brilliant and bonkers in equal parts. It is available in print or digital formats. See http://www.thedelinquent.co.uk/ for details on how to lay your grubby digits upon a copy.
They chuckled sheepishly at my interpretation of events.
You pulled me so close and my body yearned for more,
Richard Wagstaff (Dick) Clark started out working in the mail room at WRUN-AM 1150 in Rome-Utica, New York, the city where his mother, Julia Fuller Barnard, was born on 13 January 1897. Julia's father, Charles Fuller Barnard, died on 28 October 1905 at the age of 45, leaving her 35 year old mother, Anna Mae, to raise eight year old Julia and her six brothers alone under difficult financial circumstances.
I took advantage of a two weeks’ free classes back in 1990 and never looked back. I earned my black belt in a little less than three years and opened a club in 1996. In 2003, I took over the Oskaloosa club.
Today we added a knitted snowman to our advent tree. Cain usually does this but this morning he let ?Heather do it as she feels so unwell and is very whiny right now. She is all bunged up, has a nasty cough which kept both of us awake all night, and has been complaining of earache too. Hoping that being poorly right now means that she will feel better in a day or two and not suffer through Christmas.
The idea of writing a letter to your former teenage self is such a unique way to reflect on what was most likely a time of self doubt and self-absorption and reflect on all of the lessons you’ve learned since then.
Brimming with respect and gratitude Tara turned to get another coffee and saw Ron watching her.
more frequent bowel movements
Blake: Oho! You are, are you? I must have better assurance than that of a wandering voice; you may be an evil spirit – there are such in the land.
* The Netherlands has more bikes than people! The population is 16.7 million people, yet there are 18 million bikes.
Charms are not something I would usually use or buy, so I have a very limited selection - Bicycle, Feathers or a playing card (I did say my choice was limited LOL).
Other misc. note: Mr. Noda went out and pledged G7 intervention, yen surges. A sign that the G7 isn’t all too willing or able to help Japan?
So here's the fun yada yada-
She is on the beach with Dad---
We were due to play Hedge-End Town at home on Saturday. This game was called off on Saturday morning. With a number of games within the Football League falling by the wayside it was almost inevitable that Paul Dyke would text the news that Burridge, and every other local pitch had been deemed unplayable. The forecast for the coming week is far more encouraging, with temperatures predicted to hit double figures by the end of the week.
Large eye needle for assembly
i dont understand this one even enough to make a comment. You dont give complicted assignments that require a lot of explanation? Why the heck not? Why shouldnt they have fun with a hard assignment?My Response: I never once had "fun" with a long school assignment. And I think it's insulting to include "having fun" as part of the assignment. If it were actually fun, the teacher wouldn't have to say that.
“CLOCKWORK ANGELS,” the band’s 20th studio album, will be released on June 12th. This is the renowned trio’s first new collection of original material in over five years and their first studio release via Anthem/Roadrunner records. With more than 40 million records sold worldwide and countless sold-out tours, Rush – Geddy Lee, Alex Lifeson, and Neil Peart – is not only one of the most inventive and compelling groups in rock history, but remains one of the most relevant.
Women give birth, they give you life; therefore they deserve respect and equal rights! Why anyone would disagree with this statement is beyond me!
Here I am today and I still don't feel strong enough. Thinking there is no way I could ever do that again. My Makenzie was the most beautiful gift I could have ever received in my life- she taught me how to love. Through her life and through her death. She made me a different person today.
I changed the knobs out into a mirror faceted trio that adds a little sparkle to the worn finish. I had all the supplies already on hand and used paint remnants from other projects to complete this table so I didn't have to buy anything. I like how the finished design is an altered version of the popular Union Jack and not an exact replica.
Well, the next theory is a lot like the other one but it has a different approach.
I promised to keep your mind’s eye blind
Not that the female hair-purging routine is going to stop any time soon, despite the brave boycott by one truculent columnist. Neither are the lads going to uproot their beards, chest hair and pubic undergrowth, however much their womenfolk might fancy the idea. Some things are sacred.
I give him some tea...he pours it into mix and starts whisking away...I snap some photos...he then proceeds to try and get me to eat it.
Stamps: Numbers 4:21b, Gardening Cookie (SNS Digi)
For the Afghan government, it is also a way to show its people that their U.S. allies are not just walking away.
It's a pleasant book. The characters are consistent, it moves along -- I read it over a couple of days, put it on the shelf and forgot it.
Those of you who turned back on the day the two hosts met (i.e. battle of Uhud), it was Satan who caused them to backslide (run away from the battlefield) because of some (sins) they had earned… (V.3:155).
I still am one of the most loyal and dedicated members of the British National Party.
Transformers: Revenge of the Fallen
-Bryan kicks Sheamus’ head, goes for the pin 1….TWO!
If you have an important day coming, do not eat salads, pani puri, or at Mr. Burger, Roasters, or Mcdonalds.
11. Turn Back The Hands Of Time - Tyrone Davis / 2:55
Aim for the moon and shoot for the stars!
But I need to concentrate on them right now
Not only is the church silent on 2 Peter until the third century, but when there is talk of 2 Peter in the early church fathers, there are mentions of doubt regarding its authenticity. Eusebius, who records Origen’s comments on 2 Peter, records Origen as saying that Peter “has left one acknowledged epistle; perhaps also a second, but this is doubtful.”[7] Eusebius also writes,
If Sophia Loren were Head Professor of ‘Sexy: How To Be and How To Retain’, Elizabeth Taylor would have been running ‘Diamonds & Husbands’ – two courses every girl wants to enroll in.
Much of the Muslim world is completely unaware of Saudi Arabia’s blatant collusion with enemies of Islam, due primarily to the massive propaganda campaign that the state has maintained over the century, through the monopolization of Islamic literature. Instead of dropping bombs, what if we literally dropped literature containing the truth? Let the people decide their fate, not bombs? Is this such a radical idea?
jill here....Seems like fall is coming around the corner. Our weather has been beautiful and much nicer to sew with all the windows open! Sometimes when I'm designing, brain freeze occurs and I just have to switch to a less creative mode. This weekend, baby quilts temporarily took over as there is somewhat of a time issue, they are happy and relatively small! So I unearthed a couple from the unfinished pile and brought them close to finished. And the backings are the icing on the cake.....chenille and minkie!
Rest in peace, Joe. Mission accomplished.
Heat the remaining oil in the skillet over medium-high heat, and add the onion. Cook, stirring often, until the onions begin to soften; then reduce the heat to low and continue to cook until lightly caramelized, 10-15 minutes. Transfer to the bowl with the mushrooms. Add the dill and eggs, and stir to mix.
Given her status within the industry, McDermid is one of those authors I probably don’t really have to ‘intro’, so rather than repeating things, I’ll just note that you can read more about McDermid in my large feature on her for the Weekend Herald here, and at her own website here.
05 - Rosalita (Come Out Tonight!)
The Daily Telegraph write Nick Clegg is clinging to the Coalition, but is his party starting to let go? which may give a particular view of the Lib Dems right now but has an interesting point about Nick Clegg at the end which is worth pointing out:
What is this, you ask? Well, they are very tiny strips of fabric left over from our Accuquilt Cutting Studio. We cut our own 2.5" strips and 5" squares from the lines of fabric we receive and this is what is leftover from those runs. Very thin strips of fabric that run the entire 44" width of fabric. Even though the logical person would look at this and see no value in it, I am CERTAIN they have value and could be turned into something beautiful rather than another bag in a landfill somewhere.
Des’ree
“In addition, the Leveson Inquiry’s official record of Scottish government meetings contains errors which we have asked to be corrected.”
Virtually every time unschooling is covered in the media (such as the newest segment on MSNBC's Today Show) people, either in the segment itself or in the comments, refer to unschooling as an educational "method" where kids "teach themselves." And that's always struck me as being way off the mark. Unschooling isn't about unschoolers "teaching themselves": it's about unschoolers choosing how and what and with whom they want to learn.
Well it's time I shared with you what we have been up to and my silence here on the blog. My husband is done with his three hour round trip commute and so we are going to be moving. It has taken to much of a toll on our family. So we trying to move again, the housing prices have dropped where we are looking and are at least stable where we are selling, hopefully that will be to our advantage.
My number one reason is the biggest positive for me. Drum roll please... any lingering doubts about going against the status quo and pulling my kids out of school six years ago are gone, completely gone. I started with many doubts: would they learn, would they hate me, would they hate each other, what if they lost all their friends, how do I do this... These worries have come and gone over the years. When they seemed to start coming at once or I started panicking too much I would call another homeschooling mom or read a book on education. This always helped, but nothing ever got rid of them permanently, there always seemed to be some looming doubt stirring in the back of my mind. No more they are all gone, gone, gone!
“No, Tatte, you’re the goo-gone. I looked it up on the internet, and it’s you!”
I'm going to start invoicing ASH for all the coffee soaked keyboards they've made me ruin with statements like this. If I remember correctly, the review in question was actually ditched by the Coalition when they came to power but the Department of Health produced it anyway because they had spent three years manufacturing the evidence to support a law they themselves had lobbied for. It was entirely written by Linda Bauld, a professional anti-smoker who is a member of the ASH Advisory Council, a member of the Smokefree South West Programme Board and a member of the International Network of Women Against Tobacco. It would be hard to imagine anyone less qualified to produce an "independent review". We shall come back to her in a moment.
My tongue forked and wicked
Please vote for your favorite A to Z Video!! These folks worked hard on their creations and deserve your support. Voting ends on Sunday night. Go to the A to Z Blog and vote!
Yes. Everyone is aware why fuel is given subsidy, for that matter why most essential commodities are given subsidy. But when the subsidy is going to sections of the society which can do without it, none seem to be puzzled about it. But when food subsidy for everyone is being discussed everyone is constantly reminding us who deserves subsidy and who doesn’t.
Really dig the work of North Carolina based photographer Jeff Holt. The shots he's chosen to feature on his site are grainy, moody and downright epic. All his work seems to be imbued with a love for life on a grand scale and his selected works view like a road-trip full of troubles and triumphs. Under the info section of his site he put his love for what he does like this.
I’ll also be checking forums where people I know have access, and will report back on what I can.
So my apologies to all of you ((HUGS))…Now, I’m off to use the FORCE on this jerk!!!
Bike riding = 10 bucks
Brain injury can debilitate the brain’s functioning.
Milk Drinkers is an electronic music band from Ljubljana, Slovenia. The band was founded in 2010 while walking down Lesce and drinking milk.
Then today in the mail I get a wonderful letter from my child's school about truancy. YEAH! What Fun! NOT!!! So now I am wondering about the sentence that said , "We could prosecute you to the fullest extent of the law..which I do believe includes a big fine a possible jail time! Something two disabled parents who both lost their mothers in the space of a month, needs! So basically when it comes to fund raising at my child's school, they can piss off!
But here we’re scrying events still long off in the future. Let’s return to the dawning of the Davison era. Miles and Wood discuss the way in which the Saturday teatime slot that Doctor Who had occupied from 1963-81 was, by the start of 1982, completely imploded. They give an almost entirely technologically determinist account of why this was, but it’s a compelling one, so let’s go with it. But first, some context.
Although I still feel very much like myself, I know something very much has changed. I know this because of a dream I had a couple of nights ago.
President Obama attended a reception at the Museum of Modern Art - one block from Clintion's hotel. His entourage of secret service and NYC police vans and officers was twice the size of President Clinton's - to say nothing of the fleet of air bourne craft that transported him over 200 miles to get him and his minions from their DC palace to NYC The entire block in front of the Museum was divided into 3 traffic lanes separated by "NYC Police" labeled barricdes - totally clear of any plebian traffic It was, by any measure, a scene only fit for a king!!
Now I’m just calming down after a really nice and productive day. Sitting on my bed, my mug is full with my chamomile tea, with honey in it. I also have clementine juice and thoughts of popcorn. Have to have popcorn when you’re about to watch a movie. Of course! I don’t know what to watch though…
new world
The boxwood would be solely ornamental but act as a edging to the garden. Many kitchen gardens are edged by herbs, which would be pretty, fragrant and useful. Obviously the addition of grapes and fruit trees would call for a much larger kitchen garden.
To make household work, entertainment, comfort easy in a hectic and busy world, household electronic goods are primary. They mainly are electrical or mechanical goods that achieve household functions like cooking and cleaning. This apart, they serve entertainment and relaxation purposes also.
When the promotional material for a forthcoming show promises that a group of women will reveal “the secrets that have previously been shared only at private events” then you’ve bloody well got my attention right there.
In this case a private apology for a slight would be appropriately equitable and a public apology would be more than enough. Taking away the man’s job is just wrong and far more than ‘an eye or a tooth’.
"Naturally rich in antioxidants" it says on the wrapper. We can deduce that Prestat are targetting the guilty by giving them a health kick in a product deemed a social leper at the local gym. This could be clever marketing but you'll need to eat 25g (or 2 squares) of the stuff daily to gain the benefit of the (supposedly) anti-aging ingredient. Each bar has 6 squares which should last the user for 3 days. Call the ambulance, I've just OD'd.
Lee, says to tell you he will be doing a full critique on each soda pop. LOL I'll have to let you know what he thinks. :0)
Cummins and Tierney cited internal documents at government-controlled Fannie Mae describing the pilot program with Citibank, beginning in 2009, that showed that “principal reduction programs have enormous potential to save U.S. taxpayers significant amounts of money.”
Monday - AI are blaming Goth for not communicating
Stir in milk mixture onto dry ingredients, mix well.
Sandra is asking you to share some of the earliest cards you made and then some of your more recent ones. Ooooh, I do like to share - anyone noticed that!! So here we go:
340 g plain flour
As adults, we know that life is hard. We know the feelings of pride that come with hard work. We know that sometimes we just have to do something, no matter how much we really do not want to do it.
Cover: I think this cover is interesting. I'd definitely pick it up in a bookstore but I'm not sure I understand what it has to do with the book. I like the deep blue color a lot!
But wait, it's not over !
Fabulous advice! Thanks for stopping by every Friday this month, Lisa Marie - It's truly been a joy having you and please know you're always welcome back! ;o)
a little goodness to start your weekend off right and into Cinco de Mayo. All you
They watched me as I colored.
The Lord of hosts is with us;
Step 1: Collect materials
OK, now that that's all settled, I have nothing specific to say. Today started out cool and rainy, raining out the older girl's swim lesson for the second day in a row. (I'd happily have had the younger girl's swim lesson rained out, but no such luck. Younger Girl is not the adventurous type that Older Girl is, and Younger Girl whines and clings to me for the entire lesson instead of dutifully blowing bubbles and kick kick kicking like all the OTHER babies do. Plus, it's colder than you would think in Austin at 10:00 in the morning, and I do not particularly relish jumping into that pool at that time. And, on Day Two, no less.)
Episodes: 25
Julie Warner
While I was travelling in Cambodia, a friend of mine contacted me with a proposition. It turns out that he had bought a hotel in Siem Reap, and he wanted me to make a promotional video for him. I have played with the video features of my camera before, and I’ve always been impressed with the quality (especially when you pair it with a decent lens), however, I had never done a project for someone else and the idea of a friend placing a part of their advertising in my hands freaked me out…until he said that in exchange I could stay at his hotel for free. We arrived 2 days later lol
HP SimplePass with Integrated Fingerprint Reader,
"Because you won't help me!" I replied.
Exercise is critical for your physical, spiritual and emotional self. Schedule it and DO IT! Just don't do it as an avoidance to write.
But life decided to change my plans,
I guess for gamers, it’s different. They never want it to end; they enjoy it so much that they want it to go on and on. I understand that, I do. Some days that I have lived were just so beautiful and perfec that I never wanted them to end but I know that it has to. It’s just natural for things to end.
Me: ???????? (I think he won that one)....
I've talked before about New Year's Resolutions. I typically think long and hard about one concrete goal for the coming year. I ponder the things I’ve really been meaning to do but just haven’t gotten around to actually doing. Nothing earth shattering; just something that with a little bit of effort could not only be accomplished but could perhaps become a good habit.
in this oceanfloor of mercy
PM: 2:26, 4500'
When you go to the White House, there is only one voice they give to the public. They prefer to work behind the scenes.
Chandrasana - Moon Pose
Sometimes, after a phrase or a song ended,
This is accomplished with me. I accept that there is a abode in the gaming industry for the simple fun of "casual" amateur alongside the circuitous challenges of "hardcore" games. Unfortunately, while Nintendo's systems action a advanced arrangement of experiences, it is this accidental appearance that permeates aggregate they do. No bulk how abounding "hardcore" amateur like Admirable Theft Auto: Chinatown Wars, MadWorld, or Alarm of Duty: Avant-garde Warfare Reflex we may see on a Nintendo platform, they never accept to advertise as able-bodied as amateur like Admirable Theft Auto IV, Apparatus of War, or Avant-garde Warfare 2 on Sony and Microsoft platforms; or even as able-bodied as Nintendo's own "casual" offerings like Wii Sports, Wii Play, or Brain Age.
P.P.S. I told my exec: next time all my email subject titles will be “……………………………”
glares
Save yourself the trouble Miss Gaga and take a cue from Mr. Hughes. Buy a hotel in Vegas, and don't leave it. Ever.
jill crammond-wickham
Or even more spiritual in concept, that Susskind’s ‘something stored at the outer reaches of the Universe’ might be the Intelligent Being/Source from whom mystics and devotees seek enlightenment.
Thank you so very much for your care and concern.
Zoee-ism of the week-I wouldn't let her play playhouse disney on the computer, and she looked right at me and said (in her lil high voice)-well, you are just a mean old lady, and folded her arms across her chest with a humph!- i must admit that i had to laugh--and yes, i am feeling all of my 29 years this week:) i need a nap...
Ferguson, Roderick A. “The Relevance of Race for the Study of Sexuality.” A Companion to Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender and Queer Studies. Blackwell Publishing.
tomorrow we reach the halfway point in our little experiment.
I miss you so much already. I actually missed you the second after I realized you were really gone. I used to panic when I thought of your passing as I couldn't imagine life without you. From a selfish standpoint.............who was going to look out for me, stand up for me and think I was the greatest??!! But over these last few months I realized how selfish that was and I thought I had made peace with you going to heaven and with me taking care of myself 100%. But I was wrong. The perfectionist is coming out in me as I go over and over the details of your last few minutes and I wish I could have them back and dictate the event, of course I know this is a fantasy, but we do strange things when we are grieving.
Label: Basement Records
If so, spill! :)
Note: I was not paid or compensated in any way for writing this. The documentary team who produced this had no idea that I was going to mention this film on my blog. But it’s the least I can do after seeing this.
Two tablespoons Agave nectar (or honey)
Grab My Button and display it on your blog! (1 entry)
She also presented some songs from her side projects. When she started singing One love – produced by David Guetta it felt like electronic party with all the people dancing and with their hands in the air.
It is Spring at last; in fact today's Whimsy Wednesday is coming to you on the first full day of Spring. Spring officially started March 20 at 1:14 am EDT, this is called the Vernal Equinox (from "ver" meaning spring).
Once you get past the fact that they are spelled the same – here’s the difference: work is the aspect that gets you on stage, the ideas, the writing, the standing in front of people you don’t know to get them to laugh. WORK, on the other hand is all the other stuff related to being a comedian, dealing with club owners and managers, other comics, travel, lodging, etc. Anything that is not directly related to being a comedian but is essential to being a comedian (if that makes any sense).
Critique. That sounded a lot like critic, the root word of criticism, which I am not a huge fan of, constructive or otherwise. Immediately my concern went from channeling Helen Steiner Rice in order to glorify the Almighty, to how I would soothe my own bruised ego when the bruising commenced. Ashamedly, I was licking my wounds before the whip was anywhere near.
But you can see the clouds in advance of the rain actually falling- if you only would look- right? People simply have neglected to look at the stability of various mainstream financial trends- nationally and globally. Those who have looked (and are competent to interpret the simplest data) have seen for years what is coming. Those who have not looked, in contrast, have lately been very surprised- many quite unpleasantly.
The Deuce and I had already blown that with a 0/2 for the NST, so we were shooting for 8 out of 10 possible points. It's a B-, but, I told myself, still a respectable score.
A young inspiring stunt man needs to raise money to give his step-father a heart transplant in order to kick his ass.
However, I suspect that not even DFID knows exactly how much money is spent specifically on climate change. Much of the funding is grouped under portmanteau projects, covering a wide range of issues, of which climate change is sometimes only a small part.
Potential Customer(PC)-"I'm sorry, strapping young lad, but I can't afford it."
Yep, hopefully they won't even be recognizable when they are 100% complete... and today, unfortunately, all you get is a little teaser!!
Weight/Length- We will get your most up to date weight and length at your two month check-up later today but at 7 weeks on Feb. 16th you weighed 11lbs12ozs and were 22.5 inches long. I suspect you are now well over 12 pounds!
On Judgement day…. before God our Judge….
Following the verdict details of Morrisons previous history of violence was revealed to the court, including a series of convictions for assault, many of them against previous girlfriends and only a month before the murder he had violently assaulted five women in a London club. It also came to light during the trial that he had subjected Amy to nine months of abuse and violence before she eventually decided to end the relationship.
red cardstock is unknown stash. (I find it really hard to keep up with the makers of my solids)
I try to focus on what I can do rather than what I can’t.
Especially if you consider that Santorum, Paul and a few Gingrich supporters are probably telling these pollsters that they wouldn’t vote for Romney (hell they’re probably saying they’d vote for Obama) just to make their guy seem better, that will go up a point or two at least.
Flying in unison
“These rules are important to me as both an ADAPTer and a personal attendant,” said Emmanuel Camargo of Chicago ADAPT. “These rules need to ensure that I can work in a fair and safe environment, at a liveable wage, while also ensuring that the people I work for live the way they want to live in their own homes.”
HUMANITY HEALING alert
I said goodmorning. He said he was gonna kick my behind!
Well you can rebel. Do a Bart Simpson (try Seymour. Seymour Butts). Or tell them your name is ‘God’. Or ‘Heil Hitler’. Or Ivor Biggun’.
Watercress and Fennel Salad with Tuna
who is our fabulous new Guest Designer for the month of July. We are so thrilled to have her with us and we're sure you'll love seeing her gorgeous cards too.
Historically, every time we’ve come in contact with a new and different culture, we are told they are horrific monsters who must be destroyed. Meditate on that for a bit and you will immediately recall many different examples.
The study—conducted over a 12-year period in Nouabalé-Ndoki National Park in the Republic of Congo—helps to illuminate the selective pressures that influence the evolution of great apes.
I departed with the crowd into the rain and hurried along boulevard Beaumarchais to the Bastille. There, I could take the Métro toward La Défense and exit at George V station near the Arc de Triomphe to try my luck at the Valentino show.
Blumenberg traces the metaphor of knowledge as work in Descartes, d'Alembert, and Montesquieu. Among the consequences of the metaphor is the valorization of the machines and methods used for investigation. Blumenberg claims this drove development of apparatus and technique ahead even of the actual demands for them -- in a sense, new tools and methods created their own demand for use.
Along with other institutions, the church has also been significantly impacted by the social media revolution. Even though the church’s message of hope and redemption through Jesus Christ has not changed, the many ways it communicates that message in the 21st century are changing, both rapidly and dramatically!
My husband did all of the cooking and cleaning of the kitchen.
Advocates of their own story.
My friend from Okinawa, Meredith, whom I wrote about before on my blog, bought the white shirt for my first child. Thanks, Mere! Now our second is wearing it. This is a nice thing about having two girls.
Lee-Anne is a true fashionista at heart, but her style sense doesn’t just end at her closet…Lee’s cozy little apartment has such a big personality! The girl was able to make the space looks so elegant, with quaint decorations of glass vases, paintings, French Golden Era posters and fresh flowers. There is almost a rustic feel to it, which is offset by feminine accents that scream Lee-Anne!
Choose foods low in saturated fat, trans fat, and cholesterol
Yes, if it is your fate to be American, it is a good bet a fifteen to twenty pound turkey torso is laying in wait inside your refrigerator. There is one in mine, complete with a pop up thermal plug to let me know when the bird is thoroughly roasted. If your not American or decline to celebrate overindulgence this Thanksgiving holiday, rejoice and be thankful anyway, as a WBW person you will be fondly and well remembered as I lift a toast while counting my greatest blessings this Thursday. If by chance, luck has you in Michigan this week, there is a chair for you at my table and a soft pillow to cradle your head after chow.
This is how they looked last week. By the time I was done weeding today it was too dark to take another picture. I'm really excited about getting some carrots this year. I planted two different kinds, Scarlet Nantes and Danvers Half Long. These seeds were old seeds that I wasn't even sure if they would germinate. The Danvers were 2010 and Nantes were 2009 seeds bought on clearance for a nickel a pack at the Dollar Tree Store over a year ago!
Kenya Debt Relief Network; Kenya ;
We had lunch at Nayong Filipino Fast Food restaurant, a tiny hole-in-the-wall place. Tony ordered a lunch plate of adobo pork, chorizo, rice, and noodles to share, as well as vegetable and pork lumpias. Yum! I think the adobo pork was the best of the meal. The area has lots of restaurants to choose from. A longer vacation is needed.
You’ll notice that yellow and blue are also complementary colors. Red and green make up another complementary pair.
4) Help choose challenges when called upon
Three Muses challenge today is Umbrella. We had a goodly downpour yesterday and last night so appropriate here. I found the rainy overlay with thanks to Karen Burns!
Eve feels that she ought to have been born in Israel and blames her father and mother for coming back to England and preventing her from being a 'sabra': a native-born Israeli.
For the cause, I am donating my stock of stitched and eco printed greeting cards…about six dozen. This is still the year of stash busting! The cards were fun to make, especially with eco printed watercolour paper, cut to fit a greeting card window. The stitched cards have always been a favourite way to limber up in the studio…no planned designs, just playing with colours and textures using fragments left from finished works to make tiny artwork – see a selection below:
5-10 c. broth
OG=1.045@67F
Beauty: AKA the Purr Factor
Also, there are tons of articles online about writing as well. One of my favorite with a plethora of educational articles is Writer’s Digest. Visit their website at writersdigest.com. If you are interested in writing a Harlequin romance, check out their publication guidelines.
Armored Snowy Gryphon – 2000 gold
One of the three that did not submit to a test was the man who initially caused the whole fiasco by refusing to pay his prostitute in full.
However, for her third number she sang the popular and innocent drawing room ballad ’Come into the Garden Maud’. She made the cozy song – which had probably been sung after dinner parties in many of the committee members’ own drawing rooms – her own, by giving such an obscene rendition that the committee was shocked into silence.
If Apple hews to tradition, CEO Tim Cook will lead this year’s keynote, which will probably take place on the morning of Monday, June 11, to kick off the conference.
These pictures you’re looking at were found this morning by my husband after he plugged in the old hard drive to his laptop and it started right up. He called me at work all excited and began telling me which photos he was looking at. He found 40 of the hundreds of files I had. And he says that tomorrow he thinks he might be able to find more.
Tomatoes really are the stars of the garden. Both Robin and I felt compelled to write about them. Though we covered the same topic, we both said different things and you might want to read her February post for her take on tomatoes too.
And last 20 below:
Close your eyes.
No one sitting round the bar, Just the wait staff collecting orders and filling up those incredible beer towers that you see round Thailand and Malaysia mainly in food courts...gotta love that!
Today I gave her a checklist. I was in and out working all day and I needed to ensure that she ate lunch and came out of her cave. Her brothers do a good job but a list often does a better job.
Don't forget to drink plenty of Icelandic water, tap or other H20. The pure Air is for free.
* Chief Mechanic-Engineer
Misty brought a lot of wonderful and unexpected things into my life. Because she's the kind of dog that people can't pass by without commenting on, she became an easy way to meet new people, which really helped me get to know my neighbors and neighborhood better. Of course the poop scoop clean-up was never a glamorous job, but it just comes with the territory. When we moved to Lowell, we moved into one of the only places that allowed renters to have dogs. We met a TON of dog owners, but unfortunately we also found out that Misty isn't so great with other dogs and because she had no idea how tiny she was, this resulted in more damage to her than anything else. Misty loved people- especially old ones, hated dogs & children, and could care less about cats. She also loved to model and helped me test different lighting styles- but also knew when it was time to quit.
I'm very sorry to say that I cannot host Tag Tuesday at this time. As some of the regular players know, I have been struggling with my health a lot lately, and I've realized that I just do not have the energy needed right now to do this blog challenge, even though I really want to. I only have so many energy "tokens" available, and the amount various from day to day with this illness, so sometimes I have "spent" them all and have nothing left to carry on through the day. I am really sorry to just spring this on you this way, and sincerely hope that someone else will take the helm. Thanks very much for playing along with my challenges and I wish the best for all of you! Please come visit me from time to time at my other blog, A Rabbit In The Garden.
How do you find rest in God? What has He taught you about being still? What do you learn about Him in those times of rest? What do you learn about yourself? How can you use these insights in a meditation/devotional? How can you use them in a personal experience piece? How can you use them in a how-to article? How can you use them in poetry?
And as I speculated in the book, there’s several possible ways of looking at this: 1) They’re literally shape-shifting creatures, and this is basically what Keel says. He calls them “ultra-terrestrials” and he talks about how they transmogrify from energy forms to physical forms, and he talks about how the Bigfoot leaves these tantalizing physical traces, but that when you really try to find one they just disappear into thin air.
2. Organic Jonagold, Braeburn or Gala apples, .99/lb at Sprouts* (through 11/10/10)
7. SEPTEMBER THE NINTH (6:25)
The lot is a double lot which is a plus. At least there is lots of space in the backyard!
They didn’t seem quite fun enough.
If you start from the Dashboard the new interface will look like this:
Lunch: Roast beef, cooked carrots, mixed veggies, lettuce with 1/2 cup cottage cheese on top instead of salad dressing, shredded cheese, croutons, canned pears, 2 slices of 7 grain bread with margarine ans 3 tsp strawberry jelly, raspberry sherbet and chocolate ice cream. I told you not to look.
Have a wonderful weekend everyone.
I am so excited to be able to share one of the quilts my bestie Hollie and I made whole we were visiting for Thanksgiving this year!
Shortly afterwards Baroness Warsi, the Conservative chairman, used a visit to the Vatican to launch an attack on the 'liberal elite' attempting to downgrade the importance of religion in public life.
RSB
For the Biscuits:
April 28, 2012 12:56 p.m.
I hope you will join us in this weeks challenge of:-
But if you want to experiment, and to devote several hours and arm strength to see how magically transforms milk into this yummy thing, here's the recipe!
It’s not the pain or suffering or struggles that bless us. It’s the fact that those things draw us closer to God. We cling to Him and cry out for relief, forgiveness, healing, and comfort. Our relationship with God is our blessing. When the focus is on God, we are transformed, the weight of our suffering becomes bearable, and we are blessed.
I moved to Minneapolis nearly 4 years ago. When I got here, I got a new phone number, one with a 612 area code. Like many things I buy, it was second hand. Unfortunately, unlike a vintage dress, it's old life couldn't be simply washed out of it. For months and months, I'd get phone calls, voice mails, text messages for someone named "Keri" or maybe "Carrie" or "Carey" or "Karrey." Occasionally, I'd try to imagine who this Keri person was who had my phone number before. At first, it seemed like a lot of the people who were calling were old, so I thought that maybe Keri was an old person with a young person's name. But then she got phone calls from people who sounded young too. Maybe she was a young person who had a lot of old friends.
Page Ingredients:
I’m always spouting off about perspective. Why is that? Maybe it was a turning point in my life the day I gained a little perspective, so I enjoy talking about it. Or maybe it’s because I’m obsessive compulsive and I really need to push forward and find a new attribute to exploit. Whatever the case may be, I find that when I’m in the thick of things, perspective proves a very useful tool in diffusing anger and frustration.
As an immigrant I am grateful to have a wider choice in Canadian news providers, particularly considering how many tax dollars goes into maintaining the pro-Liberal state television network, CBC.
Prepare your mind for the hurricane force winds of spilt milk and measure them with a wet finger. Where you get the fluid is up to you, blood is readily available.
Last September after dinner with some ladies, I went to my car to get some flyers and while walking in the parking lot, I passed out and fell face first into the pavement. This fall cased me multiple injuries including a head trauma that took almost 3 months to recover from. Just recently I also discovered that this fall shattered a disc in the lumbar region of my spine which will require surgery to repair.
In the last few years a new Mother's Day tradition has developed here at home and now the kids are counting on it each year.
I have to say I was pretty excited about this book. I have long enjoyed the mystery surrounding Jack the Ripper – finding it curious that he was never found though I have long subscribed to the idea that he must have died in a traffic accident.
2 cups dark brown sugar
one hour interview about music, drugs, politics and social changes circa 1967
The man who pulled the trigger was Ghazala’s own brother. Ghazala screamed, “What are you doing?” while she took six bullets from a large caliber Smith & Wesson handgun. She died on the spot. Her husband took the remaining two bullets in the stomach, but survived.
What has this got to do with being a Pepper, you may ask? Nothing—I am thinking of changing the words to the jingle. You see, Harold isn’t just staging a One Man Prophet show in person over the airwaves or on his websites. He has essentially recruited a whole army of Apprentice Prophets to spread the prophecy. Such as this young woman.
The primary focus of this book is Washington’s military days. It was appreciated to learn about his time in the French and Indian War and the time before he became President, because you quite frankly can forget that those periods exist with all of the emphasis put on his American Revolution tenure and Presidency. His presidency was featured but not in nearly as much detail as his war days and it didn’t feel as if the author placed as much importance on it as these earlier periods in his life.
I know I will think of several more ideas as I go through the day, but maybe these tips will inspire you to save some money for your family as well. Remember our goal is always to be good stewards of the blessings that God has given to us whether it be material blessings, talents and gifts or simply our time! Please share YOUR favorite ideas for being good stewards of what God has given you.
I think that I haven't finished learning the lessons of 2010 yet.
What I would love of course is for all the research to flow, my brain to unblock itself, and for every door I knock on to magically open.
Sun City Girls, Funeral MariachiAn amazing book end to the career of one of the greatest bands ever.
Many male radicals eventually snapped out of their leftist trances -- for instance, David Horowitz and Michael Medved, and most spectacularly, that avowed rapist, Eldridge Cleaver.
I figured that we could start the week with some fun facts that you may not know!
The inmates will be running the asylum!
The word bhajete is significant here. Bhajete has its root in the verb bhaj, which is used when there is need of service. The English word “worship” cannot be used in the same sense as bhaja. Worship means to adore, or to show respect and honor to the worthy one. But service with love and faith is especially meant for the Supreme Personality of Godhead. One can avoid worshiping a respectable man or a demigod and may be called discourteous, but one cannot avoid serving the Supreme Lord without being thoroughly condemned. Every living entity is part and parcel of the Supreme Personality of Godhead, and thus every living entity is intended to serve the Supreme Lord by his own constitution. Failing to do this, he falls down. The Bhāgavatam confirms this as follows:
In Psalms 73:2 we read, “But as for me, my feet were almost gone; my steps had well nigh slipped.” The psalmist had been watching the wicked, how they prospered, how they had health and wealth, things seemed to go well at every turn for the wicked and they didn’t acknowledge God. He was about to “draw back” when he says in verse 17, “I went into the sanctuary of God; then understood I their end.”
Thursday again…these days keep popping up over and over again! Ugly Wednesday and timid Thursday…just keep trying to be part of my life…don’t care for these two days any week. This week I can tolerate them – Michael comes home on Friday. I’ll pick up Michael and Laycee on Friday and get to spend some time with both of them.
As I became interested in policing and mental health, I did a little bit of reading around this area and spoke to mental health professionals. There seemed to be consensus that excess cannabis use in some people can indeed induce temporary psychotic states and long-term use could lead to long-term problems. I have since seen studies (meta-analyses) which state that there could be as much of a three-fold risk of developing schizophrenia or a schizophrenia-like illness; and other studies make similar claims. It has also been suggested that substance abuse is a predictor of disengagement from psychiatric treatment. [I will shortly add links to studies which have been drawn to my attention implying the link between cannabis and mental health to be negligible.]
*He is starting to sleep a little better giving me at good 4-5 hour stretch at night, lately he will do 6 hours some nights. I hope he keeps it up. I am thinking it will be better when he goes to his own room because sometimes when he gets up he won't nurse at all, I don't think he was ever really awake.
View Full Image
Or is it as impervious as heat to a flame,
Jérôme D’Ambrosio, Lotus F1 Team Third Driver:
I have been to Bern, Switzerland the past three summers for the Sommerakademie at the Zentrum Paul Klee, an intensive two-week residency for artists, curators, writers, academics and all of the above—“art people” as it were. First I attended as a Fellow in the Sommerakademie, returning as an Editor and Contributor to a book published by the Sommerakademie and as an Alumnus. The group of people affiliated with the Sommerakademie is kind of like a family that meets up in this Swiss city at the end of every summer for little bit of fun and formality. Each year it grows as new people become involved.
we only have what we remember
» 11/27 – Phoenix, AZ @ US Airways Center
“He is the scum of the earth and I will hate him until the day I die.”
sparkles with inlaid rubies and emeralds. Polished, smooth stones like turquoise, pearls, and others gleamed under the ripples of a cheerfully gurgling stream. Towering, sweet-smelling trees lined the path and stream, and birds of every color flitted through the air. Dogs, cats, and unfamiliar friendly animals played together around me as I walked the pathway. Someone walked beside me. He or She was a comforting Presence; one that made me feel safe, loved, and content. There was a constant sound/feeling/vibration in the background. It was similar to birdsong, but not quite; something like bells, but a little different; almost like the wind, but more. When I awoke, I interpreted it as "Angels Singing". Mom told me that God had "shown me Heaven", and asked me to write it all down. I not only did that, but I illustrated it as well...an artist even then apparently. (25 or so years later, Mom still has that description of my "visit to Heaven".)
Interviewee:”It’s on my resume.”
Specs: you can clicky these photos to be carried to their flickr page, which has the goods
This query is 404 words, and I really encourage writers to adhere to the 250 mark. Not just to keep it to the one page limit, but forcing yourself to write in this short form forces you to pare down your query to the essentials.
There are some sort of rules and I just have to figure them out. Trying to dance today, a hip sway side to side, felt like a tilt-a-whirl, circling my hips I felt pulled downward; I had to stop, first because of the nausea, and second because I know from experience that if I ignore this sensation it doesn't go away-instead my knees give way. So okay I can't dance footloose and fancy free like I used to- dance around every day-, and yeah that does bum me out- but rollerblading to music that too is awesome- and I think I am going to be able to do that. Woohoo!!
What are the odds of me sneaking it in through the back door???????
another 50 miles I will have a warm place to dry out. That is a good
No, I did not know that and dern it, I still don’t even after I’ve been told. I’m thick headed about my aversion to Linkedin.
In one minority area we visited, near Dali, a fresh village mural educated people about electrification (how not to get electrocuted).
JBFUA Blog (jbfuablog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Good Morning Lovelies!
Love Gun
That eccentric mason was, none other than, Benjamin Franklin himself in collaboration with Dr. Thomas Bond. The Pennsylvania Hosptial would not see patients until 1756 with Mr. Franklin, in person, laying the cornerstone the year prior. ”Him” within the mission statement refers to a member of the community- “Take Care of Him and I Will Repay Thee.” I like this. It speaks volumes to most expertly construed mission statements of the largest and finest hospitals of our current day. I could argue, in this current state of affairs, we need more leading politicians, as Benjamin Franklin was, to step up and do the hard work it takes to show America what ethics and community really means.
choose to love. In 1991, with the Disposable Heroes of Hiphoprisy, I
Spyrer gang
And I’m trying it. I’m writing this now as part of my two hours’ writing before I start on uni admin. Lets see how it goes.
Seriously, if you don’t actually read the bills, what are you doing there, you waste of space?…
She rounded upon the dumpster. There was nothing behind it but a few stray newspaper pages. With one hand, she carefully lifted the lid. It had recently been dumped and was empty except for a lone, sealed trash bag. The lingering stench was so bad, she found it hard to believe that anyone would want to hide there anyway. She let go of the cover with a thud that echoed through the alley.
at home a little more.
However, there is an important difference with the theoretical case. This is clear if we look at the subjects of (a’), (b’) and (c’). Whereas endorsing a theoretical inferential commitment means taking it to hold for everyone, the scope of practical inferential commitments can vary. Desires are those practical inferential commitments that only hold for specific individuals (e.g., (a’)), and thus have no force for others. Norms are those practical inferential commitments which hold for groups, which can mean particular communities (e.g., the Jewish kosher laws), those who occupy a particular institutional role (e.g., (b’)), or even everyone (e.g., (c’)). This is what I mean when I say that norms are a kind of collective practical commitment. Brandom thus thinks that terms like ‘prefer’, ‘ought’, ‘should’, ‘may’, and all varieties of normative vocabulary should be understood to be a kind of logical vocabulary (analogous to conditional vocabulary) that makes explicit these features of practical reasoning.
- Conservative - John Nash, the chairman of Care UK, gave £21,000 to fund Andrew Lansley’s personal office in November 2009. In a recent interview, a senior director of the firm said that 96 per cent of Care UK’s business, which amounted to more than £400 million last year, came from the NHS. - Hedge fund boss John Nash is one of the major Conservative donors with close ties to the healthcare
Make sense of the dealings
We're enjoying time with my sis, her hubby & son.
1 medium-sized onion, thinly sliced
Agar marches off into highly speculative territory in responding to this. He reckons the War on Aging (de Grey’s term, not Agar’s) will lead to an increased disregard for the welfare and rights of those subjected to medical tests. He suggests that the use of those who do not have access to longevity increasing treatments could be used as guinea pigs, and that the introduction of a kind of medical conscription is not impossible.
This entry is mandatory, if you do not do it, you cannot do the "extra" entries. Comments like "enter me" will not be eligible!
And last but not least, the Field Bench. This is my Jake Ryan in Furnitureland...I have coveted the Field Bench for years and now they are making an iteration with a back, which totally throws me over the edge. I'm deperately trying to figure out a way to fit one of these into my world...
As always the Big Guy and I worked like demons the last couple of days before Christmas Eve to get everything wrapped, all the Christmas decor up and pretty, all of my Christmas plates and serving pieces washed and set out, the food shopped for and ready to serve, the tree completely decorated, floors vacuumed, last minute pick-up, etc. etc. Ratchlet and her family were due at about 5:30 and she called at 5:20 to say that they would be a little late due to traffic and an accident on the roadway. I was just finishing putting on my make-up at 5:20 when she called. So we actually made the deadline with a few minutes to spare! Yay! I was very pleased.
Kindergarten Spelling Word List
AR-15s are ok, but I love that roar and recoil from a real .30 rifle. You can keep those little .22's.
Will the scar tissue be too thick
Many writers' seeds of inspiration germinate and nudge tender green shoots up through fertile soil and into a warm sun. Some find themselves in the midst of a humid jungle. It's crowded, competitive for the sunlight of attention. The young plants flourish, blossom and bloom.
20. What are you wearing? hoody
The stories in yesterday's newspapers came about as a result of someone falling out with Nick Griffin who had until very recently been used by him to spread the most disgusting smears about his political opponents (including me). When you behave as reprehensibly as Nick Griffin does, when you dedicate so much time and effort to attacking other nationalists (and Nick Griffin has never focussed a fraction of the energy he spends attacking nationalists on the enemies of nationalism), and when you use others to spread your filth, you build up so much ill will and resentment against you that people will end up queuing up to get their payback, however they possibly can.
Oh right,dinner. You see, "winging it", which has worked in my past and which I had also hoped for that night, is not exactly the best idea for a monday evening in the middle of Staten Island. Kathy "maybe" knew where a bus "might be" and directed us to Forest Hills Ave where the Staten, which sounded promising, was located. So Dan and I waited on the most western-archetype deserted street in NY for a bus to bring us to the corner of McDonalds and Kentucky Fried Chicken land and the two of us, determined to find the best cuisine SI had to offer, trudged along the strip-mall like road. Where were we, Tennessee? Oh, and it turns out the Staten is a buffet mart, only open for lunch, from 12- 2 30pm. Whoops.
Want some more GREAT party ideas? Check out Mrs. Bainbridge's Class to download a FREE Christmas party idea book (8 pages) full of games, treats, activities and more! Such a great resource to print out and keep for the future!!
toward the shopping plaza
But Hal's journey to greatness will not be complete until he rejects Falstaff, and what he represents, entirely.
This is another photo from rural Ashland. I tried something different by adding the moon to this image with LensLight. I got the promo code yesterday and plan on doing the review after I’ve had enough time to experiment with it.
Life is a journey between destinations. Sometimes all that I can see is the destination, and I forget to appreciate the journey. I can get so absorbed and focused with where I’m headed, or want to be headed, that my eyes and mind blur out the time in between. Sometimes, I want to just tune out during my in-betweens. I don’t want to be there, and I’m going to try and sleep my way through until the end. But life occurs during the in-between times. If I don’t pay attention during that time, I will miss out on most of my life.
“How we spend our days is, of course, how we spend our lives. What we do with this hour, and that one, is what we are doing. A schedule defends from chaos and whim. It is a net for catching days. It is a scaffolding on which a worker can stand and labor with both hands at sections of time. A schedule is a mock-up of reason and order—willed, faked, and so brought into being; it is a peace and a haven set into the wreck of time; it is a lifeboat on which you find yourself, decades later, still living.”
So just what is International Tatting Day?
–From the Foreword by Ray Brassier
2) i've recently completely fallen for the magical Miranda July
Wedding bells are ringing again - so it was time to make a different survival kit. This one was for a bridal shower gift - "Sew in Love" marriage survival sewing kit. I bought a sewing kit along with a few other items and put the following tags on different items in the kit:
stretched canvas. The painting on the left is a sweet angel that is
I wondered what the big deal was - there surely wouldn't be lines of impatient customers at the bookshop doors waiting for publication date of this dodgy hardback rubbish crime novel that had already been published long before in America. If it got put back in the schedule it wasn't the end of the world - and they really, really weren't missing anything, I wanted to say... but by then my days were numbered.
1/08: 450 Foll/6 Men. (E2 is low)
The palace was requisitioned in 1940 as the headquarters of the German army during the Nazi occupation of Belgium during the Second World War.
as cool
Rising Tide
Two current films take a different approach, showing characters living under police states that are exaggerated, but not that far removed from our Patriot Act-ruled present day.
Case in point. I wanted a dark, moody teal color. Dan gave me free reign because this is mostly my space, but he did indicate that he preferred the teals that had less green in them. Well, the color in the top center looked pure blue surrounded by the more greenish teals around it, but it is clearly teal when you look at the paint chip in isolation.
Lakosha was very tall, even by her people’s standards. Her skin was the lightest of blues, and it shimmered in the dim lights, as if telling of her great power. It lined her muscles, which stood out with her wearing vests and close fitting pants. It was obvious that Lakosha trained often, which Brulee knew to be true as she herself would try to attend one of Lakosha’s training sessions once a week, to try and keep herself ready for combat should the need arise. The tall draenei’s hair was straight, falling clear to her shoulders, past her face tentacles, while her horns went straight out to each side. Her face, usually stern or pulled tight with concentration as she blocked, attacked, and parried during training, was usually filled with concern and worry.
play and help each other.
This question isn't meant to be answered literally although most Westerners don't know that so feel it's invasive.
Like A Bleach Stain Or Cranberry
“We have had a lot of great athletes before but never so many at the same time.” Huw Jones
Saving June has been on my wish list forever. I first heard about it when it hit the shelves in Australia and have been dying to get my hands on a copy and so I can’t wait to start it. On a side note what is going on with this cover? I much prefer the U.S or Australian covers.
That being the case, the statements made by each Council member are worth examining in more detail; some are among the most detailed positions taken in public about these issues. The upshot is that while the Council is currently quite divided, future high profile events like the flash mob robberies or the Silver Spring gang fight might quickly sway enough members to quickly dust off and approve the youth curfew proposal, and perhaps the loitering/prowling one as well.
By the next summer, the high spruce upon which Chief Seattle had leaned was cut down by hordes of Scandinavian lumberjacks who had immigrated across an ocean and an entire continent. The woodsmen were busily thrusting their cut logs down a skid road to the Yesler sawmill at the waterfront. There would be many a skid road in the Northwest and beyond before this fierce harvesting was all over with.
It was a beautiful night
Into my heart.
The most basic motors, the ones in widest use for the last hundred years or so, are AC induction motors. AC motors, like all motors, are built from a combination of coils of wire (which we know are inductors) and magnets. They have a rotating piece (not very useful without that!) called the rotor and a piece that's not moving (stationary) called the stator. Something like this (source -and more in depth tutorial than this):
How do I keep a herb garden alive over a week's holiday? Do I need a herb sitter as well as a cat sitter?
Retaining Patent Examiners: "There may well be benefits to reducing examiner attrition. But the evidence suggests that weeding out bad patents is not among them. Empirical research by Lemley and Sampat shows that the longer examiners spend at the PTO, the less searching they do, the less likely they are to issue initial rejections or demand claim amendments, and the more likely they are to ultimately grant a patent. (Lemley & Sampat, 2010). It is the most junior examiners who are most likely to reject applications. The reason is not precisely clear, but may have to do with increased workloads on senior examiners, or with acculturation into a corps whose ethos is to grant rather than deny patents."
I didn't bother to tell him that The Girl had tried to steal some flowers previously because I had mentioned that they would look nice on a hair clip, telling me, "you should make it for me!" Granted, that flower isn't what I used when I was making them. Maybe she won't like them. Maybe she'll say she does but never wear them. It's the thought that counts.
16. The brain is much more active at night than during the day.
The sun has been blazing down for the past couple of days. My favourite part of yesterday was eating my lunch in the midday sunshine-there's a lovely little cafe on campus which serves up lots of delicious vegetarian food with big helpings of kale and tahini, so I like to demolish a pile of greenery and fool myself into thinking that by doing so I'm instantly improving my brain capacity. Kale is a superfood right? So if I eat a pile of kale then I get to work slightly less hard without effecting my output. I'm pretty sure it goes something like that. One of the things I love about Amherst is how sunny it can be. Even when its ferociously cold the sun has a habit of lighting up every corner across campus which makes walking around extra enjoyable, especially walking past the big pond with its hoards of canadian geese, squawking and flirting in the blaze.
I am facing Sister Clare, and even she
#217 & #218 Roger Clemens / Derek Jeter (Yankees)
Is it any wonder that so many book collectors want a copy of Mr. Sendak's very first published work...even though it is a science textbook? Here is his debut illustration from Chapter One of ATOMICS -- and chapter one of his career:
Rest in Peace, Patrick Francis Mundy. You will be forever loved & missed…
5. Three is a lot of cats. When the roommate comes there will be four. The good news is this means that I will no longer be the crazy cat lady because, while I have doubled the number of people, I have not doubled the number of cats. Now there are only two cats per person in my household. (Fosters don't count since they are only visiting.) Another sign I am not a crazy cat lady yet...I have also not resorted to creating cat hair sculpture in an effort to get a new Furminator like some people I know cough...Average Jane. Not that I wouldn't consider it. Those things are awesome but not exactly on my new finance conscious budget.
Bane’s voice has been much improved over the second trailer and the prologue. His two lines in this trailer seem to emote differently, so that’s definitely a plus.
2. How Could I Be Such a Fool? (03:28)
Yes, I know, there are all sorts of web pages doing the math differently and somehow coming to the acceptance of the numbers printed in the Bible. The paths are tortuous and old Occam would just shake his head.
Jon had seats at Camden Yards near my family's seats before the Nationals arrived. Now he's enjoying them as his home team.
The characters caught my attention and I was very caught up in the story.
Beige shirt, Kim Rogers - Belk's on sale this year
A: Buying a ridiculous pair of shoes is totally justifiable if they’re for your wedding day (there are going to be SO many photos of them!) - I love these heels: Jimmy Choo’s Garland-glitter finish leather sandals, Miu Miu’s Glitter-finish leather sandals; and these flat sandals (I wore these Tory Burch sandals in silver for my 2010 wedding!): Red Valentino Bow-embellished leather sandals, K. Jaques St. Tropez Metallic leather T-bar sandals
Handpicked
Nor a melody
However, there is a shining star in the making in this cast, and it’s Danny Pudi as Abed. If you were to imagine the way that Jim Parsons plays Sheldon on The Big Bang Theory (in terms of his obvious case of Aspergers and his often inability to maneuver social situations) but you replaced theoretical physics with movies and television, you’d have Abed who has quickly become one of my favorite TV characters of all time. He seems designed solely to make jokes that I think are hilarious (i.e. obscure and never-ending pop culture references), and Danny Pudi manages to make Abed much more likeable than Sheldon. His completely deadpan delivery of 97% of his lines might be a turn-off to some but I like my humor sandpaper dry so it works. Ken Jeong is also a scene-stealer as Señor Chang. I don’t think I’ve ever seen a single show/movie with Ken Jeong where he didn’t take the attention from everyone else, but he cranks it up to 11 in Community as just about the worst, creepiest, and most insane Spanish teacher ever. I just wish he was in more episodes.
Next comes a history lesson on the crusade against comics hailing back to Richard Outcault's The Yellow Kid in 1896 and the subsequent nomenclature "Yellow Journalism" stemming from such low-brow culture. An analysis of Wertham's child psychiatric methods are called into question, offering that rather than coming across as a superior, authoritative figure, Wertham (and his ilk) should view children through a child's eyes.
Well there are so many ladies here and so little time. As we were leaving Marianna said “all those old ladies will miss you”.
Tomorrow, of course, is THE main event, The International Day of Juice Feasting! The rawsome Mauri is being nice enough to pick up Thubten and myself and we are carpooling the three hour drive to Seattle from Portland together. I can't wait! It will be so nice to lay my eyes on Dave, for one thing, and just assure myself completely that my amazing friend is really, truly, going to be just fine. I am really looking forward to the road trip, too! Mauri and I have been meaning to get together forever, and she is a busy mama and I am a busy mama so it has been hard to make it happen. Thubten is a hoot and I always enjoy his company.
(Nice to know they're recyclable).
You should know that, like many new social media metrics, Net Promoter remains somewhat contro­versial, with studies denying and confirming its effectiveness. Nonetheless, just by making the effort to measure promoter activity, you will know a lot more about your community, and thus the effort is likely to be worthwhile.
Before you agree to having a (private) tree pruned by signing off on the utility's worksheet, demand an on-site consultation with the Con Ed supervisor and the tree contractor's forester so as to be shown specifically the extent of the cutting / pruning. They should be able to show you with a laser pointer every branch to be removed or pruned and be able to tell you "why". (It would be a good idea if you are discussing "high-valued" trees to supply your own consulting arborist at this review meeting who will be able to negotiate better pruning decisions and alert you to major concerns.)
My loving brothers took delight in doing things like blowing up black leather gloves and shoving them at me in the doorway to my bedroom as I was walking through, so I'd think someone was grabbing at me (you had to be there, it was scary!) or putting tabasco sauce on a lemon wedge and telling me it was a 'Danish Candy' and doing the literal ROFL (before there even was ROFL) while my eager chubby little hands stuffed it into my mouth...don't you laugh, it wasn't funny! Well, I guess it was--to everyone but me...and maybe I fell for that one more than once--stop giggling, you!--but hey, I was little...like 2 or 3 little...and you tell a chubby kid it's a candy and they will fall for it almost every time....my dad didn't have to practically wet his pants laughing over it though...harumph...
Ads like these are part of a subtle, yet increasingly visible strategy that marketers refer to as "visual diversity" — commercials that enable advertisers to connect with wider audiences while conveying a message that corporate America is not just "in touch," racially speaking, but inclusive.
But the Dynamite House, and its contents, remained. A foreman Horace Putnam talked with during the removal of the construction equipment said a special crew would come later to remove the explosives. But months -- and years -- passed, and no one came, in spite of numerous reminders
We prepped him. We made sure he had a nap and we even had a contingency plan should Noah have become overwhelmed and fussy. As I walked into church with my family pushing Noah’s wheelchair, I held my breath and silently prayed....
But if you're feeling more generous and more sociable, none of the appetizers costs more than $10; invite some friends along and order a variety to taste.
So where have I been since October last year? Well, obviously I’ve been right here in Exmouth and I’ve been quite busy; but I don’t particularly feel like telling the world at large what I’ve been up to.
And I was only four. I was just sitting there, imagining his smirking chimp face at the helm of this country, and it HURT ME.
This reminds me of the old proverb about the fox and the scorpion. One day down by the lake, a scorpion asks the fox if he would ferry him over to the other side of the lake by riding on the foxes back. The fox refuses stating the scorpion would sting him and he would drown. The scorpion reasons with the fox that if that were true, then both would drown for scorpions cannot swim. The fox agrees and the scorpion crawls on the back of the fox. Halfway across the lake, the scorpion stings the fox. The fox asks why the scorpion did that for now both were going to die. The scorpion simply replied, I could not help it. It is my nature.
We had unexpected company last night and I needed to throw something together that looked like I knew what I was doing with minimum input and maximum output. This just fit the bill.
A couple weeks ago, a friend of mine wrote me raving about an excellent vegan pizza she’d made with her friends. The secret behind their magic pie was subbing in hummus for the traditional cheese. The idea of hummus pizza in itself didn’t take me too much by surprise, as I had already tried making it once or twice before. However, whenever I did it I just used hummus as the base—that is, as replacing both the tomato sauce and the cheese. My friend, on the other hand, started with a layer of tomato sauce and then piled the hummus on top of that, and then topped the whole thing off with lots of fresh veggies. Long story short: when I reached the end of her message I was practically drooling in my chair, and I knew I would be returning to hummus pizza once again.
I swapped out the vanilla for mexican vanilla (because I do that with about everything in the fall/winter) and added a bit of cinnamon....just to mix it up a bit.
my easy-going,
He looked toward her and then at the house and while he didn’t think that there was anything in there which he was capable of eating he nodded. “Yes, I will come inside. You can tell me why he was here.” That was something that could prove useful to know he thought to himself. Maybe something that he could mention the next time he claimed assistance, something that would cause him not to once again just bolt. He tired of this chase and had grown to believe that it was a thing for which there was not enough time. “If he will be back soon” he said conditionally.
4. My bed: For any of you who have ever travelled in Asia, you know that they beds here can be rather firm at times. It is such a blessing to have an American-esque bed to provide me with good rest here in China! We also tend to be the envy of the rest of the IECS Family because of our beds here in Tianjin.
It's "super Tuesday". You vote? I will as soon as I get my butt in gear. Daughter's coming up today so I want to get that accomplished before she gets here.
of friends and that she had a good time.
We could focus merely on commercial ties with other countries, leaving their internal politics alone. But our restlessness makes us want to intervene for conflicted reasons of gain and the propagation of our presumed ideals. It's why a Hollywood filmmaker could create a film like "Three Kings" with George Clooney wandering the Iraqi desert looking for gold while at the same time feeling he ought to do something for the wretched, frightened people he finds along the way. And, it is why so many of us watch to see what he does, measuring ourselves against the shifting standard his character Archie Gates represents.
A few days later, on Nov. 21, the Brooklyn Eagle ran this sad report on its front page:
Samuel Beckett had a great love for the visual arts, and – largely as a consequence of a love affair – during the 1920s and 1930s made several trips to Germany, followed by a longer trip in 1936-7, in which his diaries detail extensive visits to art galleries.
The other contenders pose a similar scenario. Other than Avatar, four Best Pictures nominees have passed, way passed, the $100 million box office sales:The Blind Side ($242 million), Up ($293 million), Inglorious Basterds ($120 million), and District 9 ($115 million). Slightly trailing behind are Up In The Air ($77 million) and Precious: Based On The Novel Push By Sapphire ($46 million).
So, I'm drinking my coffee (yes!) and trying to pick out a white for my utility room. Can you believe this damn Benjamin Moore? How many whites are there?
Well being in front of the camera and acting!! Lol.. sooo much fun! Second I was amazed how much it looked like the movie! The idea to do something like this was truly unique n’est-ce pas? I had been using these products on Jean Dujardin even before the film The Artist came out. We were already starting to do press. So the steps of what I did in the video is really what I did for him.
That’s why I like to hit my ego. Hard. Gain as much rejection, shame and failures as possible. That’s how I developed tough skin – I just don’t take it personal any more. I don’t care. And it boggles my mind how much of my life I’ve dedicated to do shit that makes me feel important. And it scares the shit out of me to see people doing a lot of things for the same things. (ESPECIALLY in med school)
These examples of triumph under native managers, lead to the conclusion that a foreign coach is not necessarily the best option when considering who the Football Association want to lead their team.
Now that I am back, I have to get ready for my next trip. My company is sending me to China for a work assignment ASAP. I will be there for a few months and during that time, I won't be able to bake or post anything. I am trying to go through my back log of posts before I leave, but it will literally be an adventure in China as I don't speak Chinese (despite being one) and they don't speak English. Nice. I guess we will see if I will survive
However, cereal remained my junk food. I would sit down at least twice a day and have two, sometimes three, bowls at a time. Each time I would go through a single bag of 2% milk. That's a lot of cereal, a lot of milk!
1/4 tsp ground mace
This film occurs in phases. First you have Scott just noticing slight changes, then you have him more at dwarf size where his state causes emotional harm, finally you get him at a size where his physical safety is at risk. In some ways, this is a deconstruction or devolution along the lines of Maslow’s hierarchy of needs. First the higher bricks dealing with esteem are removed and then the very base is threatened, and yet even in this more remedial state of existence, worried about things like food, he finds himself making broader discoveries about self. This film has a few interesting psychological points, from how Scott’s declining self-image makes him increasingly controlling of his wife Louise (Randy Stuart) to the role of expectations in self-image, how a circus dwarf, Clarice (April Kent), that he meets is much more comfortable because she is rooted in a world where her whole existence was of someone far shorter than average. Expectations are everything.
Anyway, this all went well... until the next year. The next year would be Kindergarten. In order for Liam to be able to stay with this person and her dog who we all liked so well and who liked us, he would have to attend this thing full time. It was either that or continue to go half days but not be with our friend, who we loved quite well by now. So, we opted to immerse ourselves more in this world, not less. He'd be able to stay with his buds and I'd be able to continue working there and doing a sort of loose music program. It was all good. Or... that's what I told myself.
“No event is irreversible and no transformation is final.”
Shortly thereafter, Amanda, feeling better than I, slowly pulled away from me. We had determined earlier that if one of us were feeling good, that girl should go. This was her moment. I was glad one of us was feeling okay! Me, all I wanted to do was unswallow everything I had already swallowed for the day. It was that feeling when you know that if you do that, you will surely feel better. Several miles later, I even stopped by a large trash can, in hopes that I would be productive. But I got all crowd shy, and nothing happened. On I went. But then, I started realizing how lightheaded I was. At each aid station, I was not walking straight. Zig-zagging along. I’d pour water on my arms, down my neck, over my head. Anything to cool me down.
Without implementing, or at least just starting, such essential long overdue reforms Gulf Arab States cannot and must not try to preach or act as instruments for bringing freedom, justice and democracy to any country in the world. And if they are unwilling to implement these reforms then the world must engage other countries with better records; like India, South Africa or Brazil.
It was such a fun weekend packed full of cheerleading, birthdays, family, and memory making. I'm glad that this is how we are starting off this new season. Things are only moving in the up direction and I'm starting to finally allow things to happen the way they are supposed to instead of thinking the only way is the way I think it should go.
Care: Normal wash routine (cold rinse, hot wash, cold wash) worked great with this one. Make sure to prep it properly first. Works great line drying.
Caution.. spoilers ahead.
2. Greater in value than gold
Now there is a wish ,,,,I want to Receive notification for some awards(Blogger awards)I hope I will get some soon
If time was slower, I would have kicked off my shoes and run wild through the wet grass in the moonlight. If no one was watching, I would lay my head down and roll about as a child.
1) BEE (Affirmative Action) that would have strangulated my (and especially my daughter's) future employment prospects and well being.
Of course, in my mind I thought, "Oh my god what is about to happen? This is too good to be true...", etc. There is something about dark-haired, slightly scruffy, gentle eyed southeast/central european guys that gets my heart racing. That was one of those moments. Me on my bed, pretending to play with my ipod, them stripping down to nothing but tight underwear. And form-fitting, no imagination necessary, they were indeed. The hotter one had a buzzed haircut, ice blue eyes, about 6 feet tall, nice teeth, and a jawline worthy of the best models.
coarse sugar (I used regular white sugar)
“Isn’t he earlier than usual this year?”
Finish: sheer/jelly
*Ohio Photographers: 1839 - 1900. Diane VanSkiver Gagel, 1998, Carl Mautz Publishing, Nevada City, CA, pg 14.
Another night here, in a hospital zone
Kate: Tell us about the very first idea you had regarding this story, the one that made you say “I HAVE to write this!” Was it a certain scene, character, or situation?
Now anybody can be a publishing mogul.
So this is the home-made scone of all our dreams, and there is strawberry jam and butter too. Not for us the tennis-related indignity of the fresh cream for we have seen how such dalliances with the evils of the dread tennis end in squalid tears. A perversion of all that is natural that has led others down that path where all they ever talk about is racquets and backhands, and a desire to see the glories of the coming summer ruined by hitting a ball backwards and forwards across it.
The reports give the impression that Dr Drew was sacked for emailing the prayer to his colleagues and wishing one a ‘peaceful Christmas’ by text message. Read a bit deeper and you get the impression that the problem was that he would not undertake to keep religious references out of his future communication with colleagues.
Dusty did most of that work with the push mower.
Let me give another reason, although I know I would get a lot of hate with this: I have grown accustomed to thinking that birthdays are just a way of telling you that you are one step closer to oblivion. With each candle burned, we may need to think; “Did I ever grow up?”, “Am I going to be a better person now that I am a year older?”. Birthdays just remind us of life’s requirement to grow, but it turns out to be the show-and-tell of how little we did.
ZB- I think I can handle it. Yeah? Okay.
Industrial property – a less glamorous and often neglected asset class that includes business parks, high-tech industrial space, factories and warehouses – has been thrust into the limelight in Singapore following its stellar performance in the first quarter of the year.
‘No,’ said my mother, ‘let my father-in-law get out of the bathroom. He will be shocked if he gets out and does not see anyone around.’
May 23 - Brgy. Amparo
release all your hair
The longer we're married, the more different David and I realize we are. One of those differences is that I love planning. I never knew before working with CEF how much I liked planning and that it could actually be a good thing. As strange as it is, one of my favourite times of the year is working with the group on planning the summer program.
* Outreach and recruit new Parent Advocates to the Network
Steve Webber of Webber Books asks what is the upside of a publisher who does not offer an advance;
The ladies: Mrs. Crawley (Penelope Wilton), Cora, Countess of Grantham (Elizabeth McGovern) and Violet, the Dowage Countess of Grantham (Dame Maggie Smith). A meeting of some very strong minds in the "observatory" which is set in the main hall.
The reason for that is purely geographical.
Take the ribs out of the soup pot and place them on a cooky sheet. I put some store bought BBQ sauce on my family’s ribs, but I left mine without any. You could probably make your own sauce, even a paleo version, but I didn’t have the time or the inclination. Put them in the oven for 5-10 minutes, until the BBQ sauce is bubbling and starting to blacken. (Don’t burn it! You want it to just start crackling before you take them out.)
51. Kitty, Daisy & Lewis - Going Up The Country (3:18)
kellan cuddles and g snuggles.
Chili will be served from 10:30 a.m. to 1 p.m. Wednesday, Feb. 29, in the first floor hallway of OCB.”
Zoos and Wildlife Parks (like ours) do such a wonderful job.
Your forge was always your own,
As with many old recordings on this tape deck, the left and right channels extracted on a stereo deck sound slightly different, so I've restored it back to true mono using the better sounding of the channels (right on CD1 and left on CD2) and then fixed the constantly varying volume level plus a few other fixes.
They just take on new meaning. When the songs are sung by your 8 year old. At the top of her lungs. In the back seat of the mini-van. All while having a raging case of the hiccups.
Words Matter – or – Why I Won’t Be “Tolerated” (Nov. 18): I had written a handful of short posts about the hypocrisy of homophobia, but this post brought all my threads together in one cohesive piece. Tolerance is never enough when one is discussing common humanity.
Clearly Ronan was not going to be part of BGT in 2009 and nothing from this was ever televised.
Pam put her heart and soul into this event and I am proud to be affiliated with it. For anyone interested in attending (whether you are in the real or virtual world) please find the event on Facebook or through the link in this post.
Which is before we start with the unforgiving nature of football supporters when players return from serious injuries. Jack Wilshere beware the reaction to Aaron Ramsey.
It is a simple rule often articulated by Mr Buffett: Be fearful when others are greedy and greedy when others are fearful.
Raspberries cost a bomb here. Serious. I can eat one week lunch (economy rice) with the $ that I buy one punnet of raspberries. But the other day when I went to KL, I can’t help but buy them because they were cute and small. One punnet seems to contain more than what I will usually get.. Same container but seems to have more simply because they were small. I used almost 2 punnets of raspberries for this cake. (there goes 2 week's lunch) One for the compote, one for garnish.
It’s all where one is on life’s journey and how one views age and dying that determined how one experienced the installation.
But back to the point of this post. In addition to my addiction of adding books to my collection (give me a glass of wine and I can request/buy 10 books easy!) I like to look for reasons to read.
Back of Book
This is what I meant. As a writer, we have all kinds of shackles. Some want a real readership and cow to that. Others sometimes hold those who want a real readership in disdain, but often they're shackled by the desire for respect. Because without readership, you need at least to garner some respect, right? Let's be honest; many of us want both.
Academic Excellence
When we think of God’s self‑giving and the way he humbled himself — I am saying this so that each one of us can meditate on it and apply it to himself — then the vainglory and presumption of the proud man stands out as a truly hideous sin, for the very reason that such conduct is poles apart from the model given us by Jesus Christ. Think about it slowly: He, being God, humiliated himself; man, puffed up with self‑love, tries to build himself up at any cost, without recognizing that he is but a creature of clay, and poor clay at that. (Friends of God, 111-112)
Today's lesson in crabbing--as told by Chesapeake Bay Woman, who knows next to nothing about crabbing other than she loves to observe and take pictures of it--will review the very important process of pulling the pots into the boat and ushering the reluctant crabs out of the pot into their new home, otherwise known as a basket.
Get this: you get heaps of free bbq, pay what you feel like paying, and in return they make money on the bar tab and you walk home with a certificate in that amount for the elegant dining room that you may or may not use. Click here for their free bbq ten commandments. Somehow it is win-win and Stage House emerges once again as the place to have fun and eat well. And it's a night to dine alfresco in a cool setting, sometimes with live music without sitting right next to the dirty filthy street, which is always a plus.
The kicker is that neither the epidemic element nor the murder mystery element did much to add life to the story here. The reason being is that neither one got enough treatment. The Bug could have been incredibly interesting, but it wasn't. Burns seemed content to not explain it at all. Outside of the teens who got it, no one seemed to really know or care about it. Are there stages? What causes the mutations? Is that talking mouth-mutation thing prophetic? These were questions that burned throughout the entire story that never got answered. The murder mystery element didn't get the proper amount of development either and sort of just seemed to pop up, then kind of be a thing for a while, then not be a thing anymore.
and then it will get dark. Choose
I want to thank you,for giving me the best day of my life, and oh oh, just to be with you, is having the best day of my life.
Curiously, The Millionaire’s Special is not the first that Lovecraftian investigative horror has boarded the RMS Titanic. In 1986, Fantastische Spiele GbR published Titanic Inferno, a scenario for Call of Cthulhu that involves the investigators hunting for a murderer who become a passenger aboard the ill-fated liner. Of course, it being in German, I have not read it, and it has never been translated for the English speaking market. It would seem that the subject of the RMS Titanic’s sinking could make an interesting scenario for a time travel RPG, but this does not seem have happened either (if it has, then please point me in its direction, for I could not find any mention of one). This despite the fact that such a game would obviously provide a means of getting off the ship and surviving, whereas with The Millionaire’s Special, there is every possibility that not all of the player characters will do so. Which explains why this scenario is really a one-shot, but then again, it would make for an interesting flashback to run for character that had survived and was now investigating the outré in the 1930s…
Tom: Wrong sport, different team, you goob.
Not exactly my idea of scary family entertainment. I’m not even sure if there should be such a thing as scary family entertainment, although I’m pretty sure this christmas card photo sums up the phrase, and it also ties in my last blog post to this one quite succinctly.
Combine the passionfruit puree, sugar and lemon juice, on top of a double boiler. Set over simmering water and heat, your bowl should not touch the water. Stir until the mixture is warm and sugar dissolves. Add gelatin and stir to dissolve. Remove from heat and let it stand at room temperature to cool.
In spite of all this, though, I did find myself wondering what a claim of 'organic' status had required this beer to go without. This was chiefly because however fresh, authentic, or ethically sound the drink experience was - I couldn't help thinking that the brew could have done with a little extra 'something' to really allow it to fulfil it's vast potential.
On Wednesday night of my trip I got to meet with the other Create Your Style Swarovski Ambassadors. What an incredible group. A powerhouse of creativity, really! We sat around and chatted, brainstormed about things we could do together as a group, and discussed the website. Then a tall, dark, and beautiful Austrian named Christian gave us the lowdown on the newest releases. There are loads of great new shapes and styles, but here are my favorites. First, a cone-shaped bead with a concave end so they can be nestled or you can nestle beads within it. It's called the Artemis Bead.
I'm sorry to put the word "Christmas" in the title, but for all those in denial, it IS coming up quickly and pretty soon we are going to hear cries of "where did the year go?" and "I'm not ready for Christmas yet!". Don't say I didn't warn you.
DJ Crystl - Warp Drive (Dee Jay Recordings)
The country's two main trade unions, CCOO and UGT, organized demonstrations in at least 57 cities under the slogan: "No to the Labor Reforms - Unfair to Workers, Ineffective and Useless to the Economy and for Employment."
This was done to try and push expectations for any tangible results from government intervention out to some point in the future (in this case post-election) when people will theoretically have forgotten to remember another failed attempt to intervene into the operation of the free markets.
Tell me about the dead head thing.
But alas, as I continue signing up for ridiculous races, I’ve figured out that’s not actually true.
A long-time campaigner for according rights to the authors for their creation, Akhtar refers to the provision on moral rights of the creator as envisaged by the current Copyright Act, 1957 (for a detailed discussion on the moral rights under this Act, see here). According to him, such right can neither be transferred nor be stolen from the author and even if a person obtains subsequent rights over a script, in order to make any change, author’s permission must be sought. After all, he reasons, one can very well buy a masterpiece of M.F. Hussain and keep it in his house, but that doesn’t give him the right to make changes to the painting!
Happy Simply Solo Spotlight Tuesday! Today’s guest post is written by Tonya Vrba, a passionate writer whose work has been published in numerous newspapers and blogs. She currently writes for Online Dating Sites. Learn more about Tonya and her work at her personal website.
If you do get a chance to head over to the TPS blog, leave a comment and be entered to win the whole winter set!! These digi's go on sale on Nov. 18th (17th in US & Canada) and if you're quick you could get in on the monthly digi sale!!
For the past two weeks I’ve done about zero on my novel. Perhaps only a few paragraphs at most. I had turned to working on the city map to clear my brain. Hoping that I just needed a bit of time to recharge. But that didn’t do much.
Precisely the emotion I was aiming for!
Anway, we got home and let the critters out for an outside trek around the yard. Taz and Tommy, the 2 cats included. They didn't want to come in when we all came in from doing chores so I figured they would come in before bed. At bedtime, I called and called for them and neither one came, they have done this before, so I figured they were out hunting, and would be back waiting at the door as usual in the morning.
of our city canals
04. While You Are Thinking (Adamkewitz/Braun) - 2:06
I think I have mentioned before that I live right down the street from the most WONDERFUL little family-owned chocolate shop ... Hatch Family Chocolates!! LOVE that place!! (And since my son works there, I have a built-in excuse to visit the place ... often!).
… Stoops, understandably, had his team ranked No. 1 after beating Missouri twice this season. He had three Big 12 teams in his top four (Oklahoma, Missouri, Kansas). He had LSU at No. 6.
The WBS Penguins won their first round series against Hershey on Saturday night. The arena was raucous and it was awesome to beat Hershey. I’m looking forward to the second round matchup against St. John’s. I wish we could road trip to St. John’s but Mapquest says it’s a 36 hour trip. Not only would that cost a lot in gas but my mother would insist on listening to the “Spa” station on my XM the whole trip. I can only handle so much gentle percussion music at one time. Songs like “Rustling Breeze in the Tops of Trees” and “Autumn’s Chilly Fingers” should be taken in moderation.
Our Daily Bread designs blog and leave a comment telling us that you
1 boilin'
Alexander Philip, hence to be known as HackneyBaby, made his way into the world on Easter Sunday like a particularly hefty chick (9lb 7). You may feel the name is needlessly Macedonian, but actually Alexander is for Scottishness and Philip for my dad and uncle. (different sides of the family, it would be weird calling both your sons Philip).
I told you last night that I might be gone sometime, and you said, Where, and I said, To be with the Good Lord, and you said, Why, and I said because I’m old, and you said, I don’t think you’re old. And you put your hand in my hand and you said, You aren’t very old, as if that settled it.
4th row - lights
I’ve been as guilty as any in the past of not expressing my “thank-you thoughts,” but it is never too late to say thank you for something that meant a lot to you. One of my goals by the end of the year is to take the time to write some long-overdue notes. I still think fondly of the time and effort that went into gifts and kindnesses that I have received, and look forward to expressing to others, albeit belatedly, how much their sentiments meant to me.
I remember the rag dolls, wooden toys and the joy of playing marbles and other indigenous games. I saw a lonely wing swaying on a lush mango tree longing to be lifted up to the sky with a child’s cry of joy. It tugs at my heart how far we have left the things which were not just an integral part of our heritage but also learning tools. Modern machines and equipment has taken away the delicious mellow lingering taste of food prepared on clay and wooden ovens. Chutneys prepared on heavy sil batta (flat grinding stone) spices crushed in mortar and pestle made of wood, iron or stone. The rotis , bhakri ( Indian breads) made on wood fire and the vegetables, pulses cooked on wood fire or uplas (cow dung cakes). Fast food culture has taken us in its grip ad nauseam. The traditional recipes are dying out unnoticed and neglected.
Is she really sleeping? Is she dreaming?
Hey fellow book lovers! It's another posting of Waiting On Wednesday! Hosted by Breaking The Spine, this week's pre-publication is...
This is a recipe to check out on The Kitchn today. And, you know what's better than a fresh Peep? A STALE Peep. Yep I said it. So good! My hot chocolate will never be the same.
I used this great NEW image from Nutcrafters from their new Christmas stamps. Keep coming back to see what else they have come up with. They have a bunch of new stuff
In the saloon the bartender asks Jonah how he got his scar. The reply?
I blinked and the beak floated away to reveal a large fluffy head connected to an equally fluffy body by a length of flexible ventilation duct. I didn’t require Bill Oddie to spot the big yellow ostrich in the room. Nor did I need the ‘Who’s Who of Celebrity Ostrich Riders’ to recognise that perched on the bird’s back holding the reins was my dear wife, Judy. The illusion lasted all of three seconds before I recognised the legs sticking out from beneath the bird’s body. I could see the Granada Reports tattoo on Judy’s ankle peering through the thinly stretched yellow stocking.
So, the Football Association of England has announced their new man amongst men. The bloke who will consume tactics every morning like they’re tictacs, the bloke who will train the English football team to hopefully get past Group D in Euro 2012 and most likely further – unless there’s a meltdown on the level of Chernobyl at that Wembley place (in a metaphorical way, because Wembley isn’t a nuclear testing site (yet)).
Remember this post: iTeach Micro-expressions on iCarly? Here’s a small test for you:
The Sirignano Family
The Mayor also announced that he would like to “make the 3 Foot Passing Rule a 3 Foot Passing Law” in California. He will be introducing the bill, going to Sacramento and working with the bicycling community to ensure that this becomes a reality. “We’ll keep at it until it becomes part of the California Vehicle Code.”
And allthough I don't mention you all by name... you know that I mean you!!
You take on the role of 5 little critters that are trying to save a tree from these creepy spider looking things that keep sucking the life force out of it and terrorizing the trees inhabitants at the same time. It’s a quirky storyline that is universal to any and everyone as there is no text or character descriptions, voices etc. The creatures speak gibberish and communicate through thought bubbles portraying images and symbols of what they are saying…and even then, thought bubbles are rare.
b) Lots of fat upsets my tummy. No bueno.
The distinguished Italian artist and art historian Rodolfo Papa now has his own website on Religious art. The blog is simply entitled Rodolfo Papa
So what conclusions of our own should we draw?
New pulls and knobs.
You know what …
I just love the cover project on Paper Creations Magazine this month and so I had to try re-creating it for myself. Well, the tree ended up being so fun & easy that I made 3!
When she arrived in NICU, her pulse ox was in the mid 80s and she was having trouble breathing. She also exhibited grunting which meant she was struggling a little to breathe. They have had her on 21-30% oxygen since she got there. She has since began periods of rapid breathing. They would like to see her BPM stay under 60 consistently and hers has ranged anywhere from 20s to 80s.
With that said, this shall start my personal collection. A collection of which I am surrounded by daily. My surrounding inspiration:
With three kids and a husband that works long hours and most nights, I am a pretty busy woman. Most days get away from me and then I realize it is 4:30 and I haven't given a single thought to what I will feed the children for dinner. Although I love to cook and make elaborate meals, it doesn't happen very often since my time is rationed and the boys eat like birds most of the time.
Sept 6 – The Marquee – Tulsa, OK (W/Valencia)
2. I'm the Slime
For example, until they swiftly changed their rules last year, even the Hawaiian Department of Homelands clearly stated on their website that a Certification of Live Birth did not constitute adequate proof of citizenship under their program (yet its good enough to become president?!!)
There was one more special treat for everyone... Schlafly brought a beer that's still in the experimental phase, from their "Spoiler Room," an area where they're working on some sour beers. This one was an Oud Bruin, and if it's any indication of where their sour program is, we're going to be tasting some good things. Steven Pauwels also hinted at Boulevard's Love Child series, their own sour beer line. Exciting times ahead for fans of both breweries!
Everyone has been talking to me lately about using where I'm at and being thankful for it. I do take it to heart and I appreciate all the advice I get! When most people tell me to take advantage of being single what they mean is: go traveling, go out to a bar, meet lots of people, learn a new hobby, etc.
I know there are a million and one reasons why kids don't do well in school and not all of them can be blamed on the school or the teachers or the textbooks. I also don't think it can all be blamed on parents or lack of money or No Child Left Behind either. Frankly, I don't really care who or what is to blame - I just need to figure out how to get my child(ren) through it, around it, under it, over it - whatever!
they’re tired and lonely,
Trust is important to a man. A man doesn’t want to make a girl his main woman if she is highly likely to cheat on him, steal from him, lie to him, etc. Most men want a “sweet, good, cool” girl, but he doesn’t want that girl to be extra sweet and flirty with everyone else. If he tells you deep and personal things about himself he doesn’t want to have to worry that everyone will know his secrets. This applies in general across the board (for men and women). Why would you confide in someone and bring them close to you if you didn’t trust them? How do you build trust with a stranger? Show integrity in your actions *remember people are always watching and reading between the lines of what you say and what you do*, communicate your values and sharing of yourself *see creating am emotional connection.
The nippy winter weather in Russia at the moment is so extreme farmers in Oimyakon have been forced to make their cows wear protection.
The ONLY way I made it to Mother's Day 2012 is because I have a God who has good plans for me and will not leave me.
6th Feb 1985 Glasgow Barrowlands
Tomorrow — flexing
imagine! imagine!
Irene Dunne The Awful Truth
First of all, why?? There are reasons that people fake disorders. Many of them are more purposeful than subconscious in nature. People may fake a disorder to avoid legal prosecution. I don’t know about you, but that’s not an issue for me. Some people fake disorders and illness both subconsciously and consciously for attention or to fill some unmet emotional need. Ummm….this is not the kind of “attention” I want. Really…..I don’t think so, but I don’t know…maybe, just maybe I reap some nurturance and care from it and that can be rather nice. My therapist gives me her undivided attention and sits with me, supports me, cares for me unconditionally. That’s kind of nice.
I lied to myself. I didn’t mean to lie. I actually thought I was ok at it. The process had been completed what seems to be a hundred times before. Yet there I stood, topic in hand, words suddenly flowing, and the lie filtered back into my brain and smacked me in the face. It was horrible. Every emotion poured over me like green slime. A disgusting slime that would never be removed no matter how many washes. It’s stink would still remain.
There is a prayer, popularly known as the serenity prayer, that goes, “Lord, grant me the serenity to accept the things I cannot change, courage to change the things I can, and the wisdom to know the difference.” I’ll be teaching that particular devotion to the tribe early and often.
There are 300 dead in storms in Alabama, USA
Second of all, who says marriage has to between a man and a woman? Oh wait... that is your standpoint. Not mine. So leave your silly views about love out of our government.
The event didn't quite follow the prescriptions of canon law.
My watch read 2hours and 52 minutes. This meant that, by my own volition, I had been running through the woods on my own two feet for a very long time. Even more surprising than the fact that my legs hadn't crumpled yet was the realization that I was fairly perky and still smiling at hikers and bikers I passed along the way. After three hours of hard continuous exercise and elements, it's an annoying discovery about oneself.
...you were late getting home from work but you lived at the South Pole? Could you argue to your wife that you had to "run around ALL DAY"? Geez, it's worth a shot.
Clearly this strategy has worked and equities, notwithstanding last night’s performance, have been making fresh multi year highs recently – the Australian market even snuck above 4000. But the bond markets are telling us a very different story about the outlook for the economy and it seems a difficult circle to square when bonds are pointing to enduring economic weakness but equities seem more aligned with an economic bounce.
Sometimes I will have one small toy in my bag (I have a HUGE handbag) for each of them, a matchbox car, one of those puzzles where you slide the tiles to make a picture, those sort of things. Whatever it is, I make sure it is only ever used when we are out. Not using it at home keeps the toy new and exciting for them and more likely to keep their attention.
Hershey’s assorted 9.4-17.25oz 2/$6
Fifth, take time to have a meaningful weekly home evening. With your husband presiding, participate in a spiritual and an uplifting home evening each week. Have your children actively involved. Teach them correct principles. Make this one of your great family traditions. Remember the marvelous promise made by President Joseph F. Smith when home evenings were first introduced to the Church: “If the Saints obey this counsel, we promise that great blessings will result. Love at home and obedience to parents will increase. Faith will be developed in the hearts of the youth of Israel, and they will gain power to combat the evil influences and temptations which beset them.” This wonderful promise is still in effect today.
They lost their flight some time ago. Talons
I start hovering higher. He’s just trying to rub his victory in – get under my skin. I shouldn’t have even paused to give him the time of day.
1/3 cup white wine vinegar (or champagne vinegar if you can get your hands on it)
So Saturday came and I was nervous, I was leaving for Paris in 4 days, I had just got some new clothes in to look all chic and what not in France, only problem...I didn't have a strapless bra for this shirt. So my friend Amber put TWO on me since she had bigger boobs and laced me up. I was so nervous I remember my hair wasn't cooperating, I was worried I looked like a tramp and well I really wanted him to like me.
You make me new,
Dr. Dante passed a shaking hand over his eyes, then took the pistol from his belt and handed it to the doll. "Take it," he said bitterly. "Why not, Daniel, you got everything else."
- This has some after tones of kerosene.
Hubby: Me?! You even compare our blood work after our physicals.
This card is for my lovely fellow D.T member Sue Lelli, as it's her birthday next week! This card is winging it's way across the Atlantic to Sue right now!
In Honor by Jessi Kirby: Again, with the hard hitting emotions mixed with the perfect amount of sweetness and humor. Honor is a stellar character, one who is oblivious to a few things from how much pain she's in over losing her brother, and Rusty is the perfect counterpart, full of anger he doesn't really know what to do with. Watching these two relive the history they share, the stories of her brother and his best friend, and also figure out where to go from here... beautiful, and memorable.
Onward and downward. A good diet, good exercise and a healthy life style. Working on it. Not easy but well worth it.
